Nebraska, session 109, LB1257.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-2-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 2-2701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-2701 (1) No person shall be permitted to sell or dispose of any
current tractor model of one hundred or more horsepower in the State of
Nebraska without first having (a) made application for a permit and
obtained a permit to sell the tractor model, (b) the model tested by the
University of Nebraska onsite or offsite or by any Organization for
Economic Cooperation and Development test station, and (c) the model
passed upon by the board.
(2) A person may obtain a permit to sell or dispose of a current
tractor model of less than one hundred horsepower by meeting the permit
requirements of sections 2-2701 to 2-2711. A purchaser of a current
tractor model is not eligible to claim the exemption from sales and use
tax for agricultural machinery and equipment under section 77-2704.36
unless the current tractor model has been permitted for sale pursuant to
sections 2-2701 to 2-2711.
(3) Each and every tractor model presented for testing shall be a
stock model and shall not be equipped with any special accessory unless
regularly supplied to the trade. Any tractor model not complying with
this section shall not be tested under sections 2-2701 to 2-2711.
Applications shall be made to the board and shall be accompanied by
specifications of the tractor model required by the board and by the
applicable fees specified in sections 2-2705 and 2-2705.01.
(4) If an official test application, with the required
specifications and fees, is submitted to any Organization for Economic
Cooperation and Development test station or to the University of Nebraska
and an application for a temporary permit and the fee prescribed in
section 2-2705.01 are submitted, the department, with the approval of the
board, may issue a temporary permit for the sale of the tractor model
specified in the official test application. The date on which the
temporary permit terminates shall be fixed by the board. All temporary
-3-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
permits shall be conditioned upon such tractor model being tested at a
mutually agreed-upon date, and the person to whom a temporary permit has
been issued shall submit a tractor model for testing which conforms to
the specifications filed with the official test application. Such tractor
model shall be delivered for testing at the mutually agreed-upon date.
Upon failure so to do, all such fees deposited by such person shall be
forfeited to the University of Nebraska Tractor Test Cash Fund, except
that the fee imposed in section 2-2705.01 shall be deposited in and
forfeited to the Tractor Permit Cash Fund, and in addition such person
shall not be issued any temporary permit for a period of five years from
the date such tractor was to be delivered for testing and until such
person meets the obligations required under subsection (5) of this
section to the department's satisfaction.
(5) All sales of tractors upon which a temporary permit has been
issued shall be made subject to the final official test and approval of
the tractor model as follows:
(a) If a tractor model upon which a temporary permit has been issued
was not submitted for the official test and approval on the mutually
agreed-upon date, the person to whom the temporary permit was issued
shall repurchase any such tractor sold in Nebraska under the temporary
permit. A claim by a purchaser under this subdivision shall be brought
within two years after the date of the expiration of the temporary
permit; and
(b) If a tractor model upon which a temporary permit has been issued
fails in the official test to meet the specifications of the tractor
model which were filed with the application and fees, the person to whom
the temporary permit was issued shall send a notice, as approved by the
department, to any person in Nebraska who has purchased a tractor sold
under the temporary permit. The person to whom the temporary permit was
issued shall either modify the tractor to meet the specifications filed
with the board or remedy to the satisfaction of the purchaser any injury
-4-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
incurred by the purchaser which was caused by the failure of the tractor
to meet the specifications claimed. Such person shall be prohibited from
modifying sales literature, advertisement claims, or specifications of
the tractor to avoid such notice.
Sec. 2. Section 77-382, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-382 (1) The department shall prepare a tax expenditure report
describing (a) the basic provisions of the Nebraska tax laws, (b) the
actual or estimated revenue loss caused by the exemptions, deductions,
exclusions, deferrals, credits, and preferential rates in effect on July
1 of each year and allowed under Nebraska's tax structure and in the
property tax, (c) the actual or estimated revenue loss caused by failure
to impose sales and use tax on services purchased for nonbusiness use,
and (d) the elements which make up the tax base for state and local
income, including income, sales and use, property, and miscellaneous
taxes.
(2) The department shall review the major tax exemptions for which
state general funds are used to reduce the impact of revenue lost due to
a tax expenditure. The report shall indicate an estimate of the amount of
the reduction in revenue resulting from the operation of all tax
expenditures. The report shall list each tax expenditure relating to
sales and use tax under the following categories:
(a) Agriculture, which shall include a separate listing for each
item the following items: Agricultural machinery; agricultural chemicals;
seeds sold to commercial producers; water for irrigation and
manufacturing; commercial artificial insemination; mineral oil as dust
suppressant; animal grooming; oxygen for use in aquaculture; animal life
whose products constitute food for human consumption; and grains;
(b) Business across state lines, which shall include a separate
listing for each item the following items: Property shipped out-of-state;
fabrication labor for items to be shipped out-of-state; property to be
-5-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
transported out-of-state; property purchased in other states to be used
in Nebraska; aircraft delivery to an out-of-state resident or business;
state reciprocal agreements for industrial machinery; and property taxed
in another state;
(c) Common carrier and logistics, which shall include a separate
listing for each item the following items: Railroad rolling stock and
repair parts and services; common or contract carriers and repair parts
and services; common or contract carrier accessories; and common or
contract carrier safety equipment;
(d) Consumer goods, which shall include a separate listing for each
item the following items: Motor vehicles and motorboat trade-ins;
merchandise trade-ins; certain medical equipment and medicine;
newspapers; laundromats; telefloral deliveries; motor vehicle discounts
for the disabled; and political campaign fundraisers;
(e) Energy, which shall include a separate listing for each item the
following items: Motor fuels; energy used in industry; energy used in
agriculture; aviation fuel; and minerals, oil, and gas severed from real
property;
(f) Food, which shall include a separate listing for each item the
following items: Food for home consumption; Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program; school lunches; meals sold by hospitals; meals sold
by institutions at a flat rate; food for the elderly, handicapped, and
Supplemental Security Income recipients; and meals sold by churches;
(g) General business, which shall include a separate listing for
each item the following items: Component and ingredient parts;
manufacturing machinery; containers; film rentals; molds and dies;
syndicated programming; intercompany sales; intercompany leases; sale of
a business or farm machinery; and transfer of property in a change of
business ownership;
(h) Lodging and shelter, which shall include a separate listing for
each the following item : Room rentals by certain institutions;
-6-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
(i) Miscellaneous, which shall include a separate listing for each
item the following items: Cash discounts and coupons; separately stated
finance charges; casual sales; lease-to-purchase agreements; and
separately stated taxes;
(j) Nonprofits, governments, and exempt entities, which shall
include a separate listing for each item the following items: Purchases
by political subdivisions of the state; purchases by churches and
nonprofit colleges and medical facilities; purchasing agents for public
real estate construction improvements; contractor as purchasing agent for
public agencies; Nebraska lottery; admissions to school events; sales on
Native American Indian reservations; school-supporting fundraisers; fine
art purchases by a museum; purchases by the Nebraska State Fair Board;
purchases by the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority and licensees of
the State Racing and Gaming Commission; purchases by the United States
Government; public records; and sales by religious organizations;
(k) Recent sales tax expenditures, which shall include a separate
listing for each sales tax expenditure created by statute or rule and
regulation after July 19, 2012;
(l) Services purchased for nonbusiness use, which shall include a
separate listing for each such service , including, but not limited to,
the following items: Motor vehicle cleaning, maintenance, and repair
services; cleaning and repair of clothing; cleaning, maintenance, and
repair of other tangible personal property; maintenance, painting, and
repair of real property; entertainment admissions; personal care
services; lawn care, gardening, and landscaping services; pet-related
services; storage and moving services; household utilities; other
personal services; taxi, limousine, and other transportation services;
legal services; accounting services; other professional services; and
other real estate services; and
(m) Telecommunications, which shall include a separate listing for
each item the following items: Telecommunications access charges; prepaid
-7-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
calling arrangements; conference bridging services; and nonvoice data
services.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that nothing in the Tax
Expenditure Reporting Act shall cause the valuation or assessment of any
property exempt from taxation on the basis of its use exclusively for
religious, educational, or charitable purposes.
Sec. 3. Section 77-2701, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2701 Sections 77-2701 to 77-27,135.01, 77-27,222, 77-27,235,
77-27,236, and 77-27,238 to 77-27,242 and sections 9 and 58 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.
Sec. 4. Section 77-2701.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2701.04 For purposes of sections 77-2701.04 to 77-2713 and
77-27,239 and sections 9 and 58 of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the definitions found in sections 77-2701.05 to 77-2701.55 and
section 9 of this act 77-2701.56 shall be used.
Sec. 5. Section 77-2701.16, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-2701.16 (1) Gross receipts means the total amount of the sale or
lease or rental price, as the case may be, of the retail sales of
retailers.
(2) Gross receipts of every person engaged as a public utility
specified in this subsection, as a community antenna television service
operator, or as a satellite service operator or any person involved in
connecting and installing services defined in subdivision (2)(a), (b), or
(d) of this section means:
(a)(i) In the furnishing of telephone communication service, other
than mobile telecommunications service as described in section
77-2703.04, the gross income received from furnishing ancillary services,
except for conference bridging services, and intrastate
-8-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
telecommunications services, except for value-added, nonvoice data
service.
(ii) In the furnishing of mobile telecommunications service as
described in section 77-2703.04, the gross income received from
furnishing mobile telecommunications service that originates and
terminates in the same state to a customer with a place of primary use in
Nebraska;
(b) In the furnishing of telegraph service, the gross income
received from the furnishing of intrastate telegraph services;
(c)(i) In the furnishing of gas, sewer, water, and electricity
service, other than electricity service to a customer-generator as
defined in section 70-2002, the gross income received from the furnishing
of such services upon billings or statements rendered to consumers for
such utility services.
(ii) In the furnishing of electricity service to a customer-
generator as defined in section 70-2002, the net energy use upon billings
or statements rendered to customer-generators for such electricity
service;
(d) In the furnishing of community antenna television service or
satellite service, the gross income received from the furnishing of such
community antenna television service as regulated under sections 18-2201
to 18-2205 or 23-383 to 23-388 or satellite service; and
(e) The gross income received from the provision, installation,
construction, servicing, or removal of property used in conjunction with
the furnishing, installing, or connecting of any public utility services
specified in subdivision (2)(a) or (b) of this section or community
antenna television service or satellite service specified in subdivision
(2)(d) of this section, except when acting as a subcontractor for a
public utility, this subdivision does not apply to the gross income
received by a contractor electing to be treated as a consumer of building
materials under subdivision (2) or (3) of section 77-2701.10 for any such
-9-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
services performed on the customer's side of the utility demarcation
point. This subdivision also does not apply to:
(i) The gross income received by a political subdivision of the
state, an electric cooperative, or an electric membership association for
the lease or use of, or by a contractor for the construction of or
services provided on, electric generation, transmission, distribution, or
street lighting structures or facilities owned by a political subdivision
of the state, an electric cooperative, or an electric membership
association; or
(ii) The gross income received for the lease or use of towers or
other structures and equipment, including antennas and studio transmitter
link systems, primarily used in conjunction with the furnishing of (A)
Internet access services, (B) agricultural global positioning system
locating services, or (C) over-the-air radio and television broadcasting
via radio and television broadcast stations licensed by the Federal
Communications Commission. For purposes of this subdivision, studio
transmitter link system means a radiofrequency apparatus which serves as
a conduit to deliver station programming content from its origin in a
studio to a broadcast transmitter and antenna.
(3) Gross receipts of every person engaged in selling, leasing, or
otherwise providing intellectual or entertainment property means:
(a) In the furnishing of computer software, the gross income
received, including the charges for coding, punching, or otherwise
producing any computer software and the charges for the tapes, disks,
punched cards, or other properties furnished by the seller; and
(b) In the furnishing of videotapes, movie film, satellite
programming, satellite programming service, and satellite television
signal descrambling or decoding devices, the gross income received from
the license, franchise, or other method establishing the charge.
(4) Gross receipts includes the gross income received for providing
a service. Services shall be presumed taxable unless a specific exemption
-10-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
applies. for providing a service means:
(a) The gross income received for building cleaning and maintenance,
pest control, and security;
(b) The gross income received for motor vehicle washing, waxing,
towing, and painting;
(c) The gross income received for computer software training;
(d) The gross income received for installing and applying tangible
personal property if the sale of the property is subject to tax. If any
or all of the charge for installation is free to the customer and is paid
by a third-party service provider to the installer, any tax due on that
part of the activation commission, finder's fee, installation charge, or
similar payment made by the third-party service provider shall be paid
and remitted by the third-party service provider;
(e) The gross income received for services of recreational vehicle
parks;
(f) The gross income received for labor for repair or maintenance
services performed with regard to tangible personal property the sale of
which would be subject to sales and use taxes, excluding motor vehicles,
except as otherwise provided in section 77-2704.26 or 77-2704.50;
(g) The gross income received for animal specialty services except
(i) veterinary services, (ii) specialty services performed on livestock
as defined in section 54-183, and (iii) animal grooming performed by a
licensed veterinarian or a licensed veterinary technician in conjunction
with medical treatment; and
(h) The gross income received for detective services.
(5) Gross receipts includes the sale of admissions. When an
admission to an activity or a membership constituting an admission is
combined with the solicitation of a contribution, the portion or the
amount charged representing the fair market price of the admission shall
be considered a retail sale subject to the tax imposed by section
77-2703. The organization conducting the activity shall determine the
-11-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
amount properly attributable to the purchase of the privilege, benefit,
or other consideration in advance, and such amount shall be clearly
indicated on any ticket, receipt, or other evidence issued in connection
with the payment.
(6) Gross receipts includes the sale of live plants incorporated
into real estate except when such incorporation is incidental to the
transfer of an improvement upon real estate or the real estate.
(7) Gross receipts includes the sale of any building materials
annexed to real estate by a person electing to be taxed as a retailer
pursuant to subdivision (1) of section 77-2701.10.
(8) Gross receipts includes the sale of and recharge of prepaid
calling service and prepaid wireless calling service.
(9) Gross receipts includes the retail sale of digital audio works,
digital audiovisual works, digital codes, and digital books delivered
electronically if the products are taxable when delivered on tangible
storage media. A sale includes the transfer of a permanent right of use,
the transfer of a right of use that terminates on some condition, and the
transfer of a right of use conditioned upon the receipt of continued
payments.
(10) Gross receipts includes any receipts from sales of tangible
personal property made over a multivendor marketplace platform that acts
as the intermediary by facilitating sales between a seller and the
purchaser and that, either directly or indirectly through agreements or
arrangements with third parties, collects payment from the purchaser and
transmits payment to the seller.
(11) Gross receipts does not include:
(a) The amount of any rebate granted by a motor vehicle or motorboat
manufacturer or dealer at the time of sale of the motor vehicle or
motorboat, which rebate functions as a discount from the sales price of
the motor vehicle or motorboat; or
(b) The price of property or services returned or rejected by
-12-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
customers when the full sales price is refunded either in cash or credit.
Sec. 6. Section 77-2701.24, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-2701.24 Occasional sale means:
(1) A sale, but not a lease or rental, of property which is the
subject of any intercompany sale or transfer involving any parent,
subsidiary, or brother-sister company relationship under section
77-2704.28 and which was either originally acquired prior to June 1,
1967, or, if acquired thereafter, the seller or transferor directly or
indirectly has previously paid a sales or use tax thereon, including:
(a) From one corporation to another corporation pursuant to a
reorganization. For purposes of this subdivision, reorganization means a
statutory merger or consolidation or the acquisition by a corporation of
substantially all of the properties of another corporation when the
consideration is solely all or a part of the voting stock of the
acquiring corporation or of its parent or subsidiary corporation;
(b) In connection with the winding up, dissolution, or liquidation
of a corporation only when there is a distribution of the property of
such corporation to the shareholders in kind if the portion of the
property so distributed to the shareholder is substantially in proportion
to the share of stock or securities held by the shareholder;
(c) To a corporation for the purpose of organization of such
corporation or the contribution of additional capital to such corporation
when the former owners of the property transferred are immediately after
the transfer in control of the corporation and the stock or securities
received by each is substantially in proportion to his or her interest in
the property prior to the transfer;
(d) To a partnership in the organization of such partnership if the
former owners of the property transferred are immediately after the
transfer members of such partnership and the interest in the partnership
received by each is substantially in proportion to his or her interest in
-13-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
the property prior to the transfer;
(e) From a partnership to the members thereof when made in kind in
the dissolution of such partnership if the portion of the property so
distributed to the members of the partnership is substantially in
proportion to the interest in the partnership held by the members;
(f) To a limited liability company in the organization of such
limited liability company if the former owners of the property
transferred are immediately after the transfer members of such limited
liability company and the interest in the limited liability company
received by each is substantially in proportion to his or her interest in
the property prior to the transfer;
(g) From a limited liability company to the members thereof when
made in kind in the dissolution of such limited liability company if the
portion of the property so distributed to the members of the limited
liability company is substantially in proportion to the interest in the
limited liability company held by the members;
(h) From one limited liability company to another limited liability
company pursuant to a reorganization; or
(i) Any transaction between two persons that qualifies as a tax-free
transaction under the Internal Revenue Code;
(2) A sale of household goods, personal effects, and services if
each of the following conditions is met and if any one condition is not
met then the entire gross receipts shall be subject to the tax imposed by
section 77-2703:
(a) Such sales are by an individual at his or her residence or if
more than one individual's property is involved such sales are by one of
the individuals involved at the residence of one of the individuals or
such sales are by an individual on an online auction site;
(b) Such sales do not occur at any residence or on an online auction
site for more than three days during a calendar year;
(c) Such individual or individuals or any member of any of their
-14-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
households does not conduct or engage in a trade or business in which
similar items are sold or services provided;
(d) Such property sold was originally acquired for and used for
personal use or the service provided may be performed at any individual
residence without specialized equipment or supplies; and
(e) Such property is not otherwise excepted from the definition of
occasional sale;
(3) Commencing with any transaction occurring on or after October 1,
1985, any sale of business or farm machinery and equipment if each of the
following conditions is met and if any one condition is not met the
entire gross receipts shall be subject to the tax imposed by section
77-2703:
(a) Such machinery or equipment was used by the seller or seller's
predecessor in a sale described in subdivision (1) of this section as a
depreciable capital asset in connection with the farm or business for a
period of at least one year;
(b) Such property was originally acquired prior to June 1, 1967, or
if acquired thereafter, the seller or seller's predecessor in a sale
described in subdivision (1) of this section directly or indirectly has
previously paid a sales or use tax thereon; and
(c) Such property is not otherwise excepted from the definition of
occasional sale;
(4) Commencing October 1, 1985, a sale by an organization created
exclusively for religious purposes or an agent of the organization for
such sale if each of the following conditions is met and if any one
condition is not met then the entire gross receipts shall be subject to
the tax imposed by section 77-2703:
(a) All sales occur during an activity conducted by such
organization or, if more than one organization is involved, by one of the
organizations owning property being sold;
(b) The organization only sells property it owns or provides the
-15-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
service during one such activity in a calendar year; and
(c) The activity does not last longer than three consecutive days;
and
(5) Any sale that is made in connection with the sale to a single
buyer of all or substantially all of a trade or business if the seller or
seller's predecessor in a sale described in subdivision (1) of this
section directly or indirectly has previously paid a sales or use tax
thereon. This subdivision shall apply to any transaction occurring on or
after October 1, 1985.
Commencing October 1, 1985, occasional sale does not include any
sale directly by or any sale which is supervised or aided by an
auctioneer or an agent or employee of an auctioneer.
Except for a sale listed in subdivision (1) of this section, an
occasional sale does not mean any sale of motor vehicles, semitrailers,
or trailers as defined in the Motor Vehicle Registration Act or any sale
of a motorboat as defined in section 37-1204.
Sec. 7. Section 77-2701.32, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2701.32 (1) Retailer means any seller.
(2) To facilitate the proper administration of the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967, the following persons have the duties and responsibilities
of sellers for the purposes of sales and use taxes:
(a) Any person in the business of making sales subject to tax under
section 77-2703 at auction of property owned by the person or others;
(b) Any person collecting the proceeds of the auction, other than
the owner of the property, together with his or her principal, if any,
when the person collecting the proceeds of the auction is not the
auctioneer or an agent or employee of the auctioneer. The seller does not
include the auctioneer in such case;
(c) Every person who has elected to be considered a retailer
pursuant to subdivision (1) of section 77-2701.10;
-16-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
(d) Every person operating, organizing, or promoting a flea market,
craft show, fair, or similar event;
(e) Every person engaged in the business of providing any service in
this state defined in subsection (4) of section 77-2701.16; and
(f) Every person operating a multivendor marketplace platform that
(i) acts as the intermediary by facilitating sales between a seller and
the purchaser or that engages directly or indirectly through one or more
affiliated persons in transmitting or otherwise communicating the offer
or acceptance between the seller and purchaser and (ii) either directly
or indirectly through agreements or arrangements with third parties,
collects payment from the purchaser and transmits payment to the seller.
(3) For the proper administration of the Nebraska Revenue Act of
1967, the following persons do not have the duties and responsibilities
of a seller for purposes of sales and use taxes:
(a) Any person who leases or rents films when an admission tax is
charged under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967;
(b) Any person who leases or rents railroad rolling stock
interchanged pursuant to the provisions of the federal Interstate
Commerce Act;
(c) Any person engaged in the business of furnishing rooms in a
facility licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act in which
rooms, lodgings, or accommodations are regularly furnished for a
consideration or a facility operated by an educational institution
established under Chapter 79 or Chapter 85 in which rooms are regularly
used to house students for a consideration for periods in excess of
thirty days;
(d) Any person making sales at a flea market, craft show, fair, or
similar event when such person does not have a sales tax permit and has
arranged to pay sales taxes collected to the person operating,
organizing, or promoting such event; or
(e) Any payment processor appointed by a retailer whose sole
-17-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
activity with regard to a sale or lease transaction is to process the
payment made from the customer to the retailer.
Sec. 8. Section 77-2701.36, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-2701.36 Seller includes (1) every person engaged in the business
of selling, leasing, or renting property of a kind the gross receipts
from the retail sale, lease, or rental of which are required to be
included in the measure of the sales tax and (2) every person engaged in
the business of providing services the gross receipts from the retail
sale of which are required to be included in the measure of the sales
tax.
Sec. 9. Service means all activities that are engaged in for other
persons for a consideration and that involve predominantly the
performance of a service as distinguished from selling or leasing
tangible personal property. The term does not include services rendered
by an employee to his or her employer. In determining what is a service,
the intended use, principal objective, or ultimate objective of the
contracting parties shall not be controlling.
Sec. 10. Section 77-2703, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-2703 (1) There is hereby imposed a tax at the rate provided in
section 77-2701.02 upon the gross receipts from all sales of tangible
personal property sold at retail in this state; the gross receipts of
every person engaged as a public utility, as a community antenna
television service operator, or as a satellite service operator, any
person involved in the connecting and installing of the services defined
in subdivision (2)(a), (b), (d), or (e) of section 77-2701.16, or every
person engaged as a retailer of intellectual or entertainment properties
referred to in subsection (3) of section 77-2701.16; the gross receipts
from the sale of admissions in this state; the gross receipts from the
sale of warranties, guarantees, service agreements, or maintenance
-18-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
agreements when the items covered are subject to tax under this section;
beginning January 1, 2008, the gross receipts from the sale of bundled
transactions when one or more of the products included in the bundle are
taxable; the gross receipts from the provision of services in this state
defined in subsection (4) of section 77-2701.16; and the gross receipts
from the sale of products delivered electronically as described in
subsection (9) of section 77-2701.16. Except as provided in section
77-2701.03, when there is a sale, the tax shall be imposed at the rate in
effect at the time the gross receipts are realized under the accounting
basis used by the retailer to maintain his or her books and records.
(a) The tax imposed by this section shall be collected by the
retailer from the consumer. It shall constitute a part of the purchase
price and until collected shall be a debt from the consumer to the
retailer and shall be recoverable at law in the same manner as other
debts. The tax required to be collected by the retailer from the consumer
constitutes a debt owed by the retailer to this state.
(b) It is unlawful for any retailer to advertise, hold out, or state
to the public or to any customer, directly or indirectly, that the tax or
part thereof will be assumed or absorbed by the retailer, that it will
not be added to the selling, renting, or leasing price of the property
sold, rented, or leased, or that, if added, it or any part thereof will
be refunded. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to a
public utility.
(c) The tax required to be collected by the retailer from the
purchaser, unless otherwise provided by statute or by rule and regulation
of the Tax Commissioner, shall be displayed separately from the list
price, the price advertised in the premises, the marked price, or other
price on the sales check or other proof of sales, rentals, or leases.
(d) For the purpose of more efficiently securing the payment,
collection, and accounting for the sales tax and for the convenience of
the retailer in collecting the sales tax, it shall be the duty of the Tax
-19-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
Commissioner to provide a schedule or schedules of the amounts to be
collected from the consumer or user to effectuate the computation and
collection of the tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. Such
schedule or schedules shall provide that the tax shall be collected from
the consumer or user uniformly on sales according to brackets based on
sales prices of the item or items. Retailers may compute the tax due on
any transaction on an item or an invoice basis. The rounding rule
provided in section 77-3,117 applies.
(e) The use of tokens or stamps for the purpose of collecting or
enforcing the collection of the taxes imposed in the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967 or for any other purpose in connection with such taxes is
prohibited.
(f) For the purpose of the proper administration of the provisions
of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 and to prevent evasion of the retail
sales tax, it shall be presumed that all gross receipts are subject to
the tax until the contrary is established. The burden of proving that a
sale of property is not a sale at retail is upon the person who makes the
sale unless he or she takes from the purchaser (i) a resale certificate
to the effect that the property is purchased for the purpose of
reselling, leasing, or renting it, (ii) an exemption certificate pursuant
to subsection (7) of section 77-2705, or (iii) a direct payment permit
pursuant to sections 77-2705.01 to 77-2705.03. Receipt of a resale
certificate, exemption certificate, or direct payment permit shall be
conclusive proof for the seller that the sale was made for resale or was
exempt or that the tax will be paid directly to the state.
(g) In the rental or lease of automobiles, trucks, trailers,
semitrailers, and truck-tractors as defined in the Motor Vehicle
Registration Act, the tax shall be collected by the lessor on the rental
or lease price, except as otherwise provided within this section.
(h) In the rental or lease of automobiles, trucks, trailers,
semitrailers, and truck-tractors as defined in the act, for periods of
-20-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
one year or more, the lessor may elect not to collect and remit the sales
tax on the gross receipts and instead pay a sales tax on the cost of such
vehicle. If such election is made, it shall be made pursuant to the
following conditions:
(i) Notice of the desire to make such election shall be filed with
the Tax Commissioner and shall not become effective until the Tax
Commissioner is satisfied that the taxpayer has complied with all
conditions of this subsection and all rules and regulations of the Tax
Commissioner;
(ii) Such election when made shall continue in force and effect for
a period of not less than two years and thereafter until such time as the
lessor elects to terminate the election;
(iii) When such election is made, it shall apply to all vehicles of
the lessor rented or leased for periods of one year or more except
vehicles to be leased to common or contract carriers who provide to the
lessor a valid common or contract carrier exemption certificate. If the
lessor rents or leases other vehicles for periods of less than one year,
such lessor shall maintain his or her books and records and his or her
accounting procedure as the Tax Commissioner prescribes; and
(iv) The Tax Commissioner by rule and regulation shall prescribe the
contents and form of the notice of election, a procedure for the
determination of the tax base of vehicles which are under an existing
lease at the time such election becomes effective, the method and manner
for terminating such election, and such other rules and regulations as
may be necessary for the proper administration of this subdivision.
(i) The tax imposed by this section on the sales of motor vehicles,
semitrailers, and trailers as defined in sections 60-339, 60-348, and
60-354 shall be the liability of the purchaser and, with the exception of
motor vehicles, semitrailers, and trailers registered pursuant to section
60-3,198, the tax shall be collected by the county treasurer as provided
in the Motor Vehicle Registration Act or by an approved licensed dealer
-21-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
participating in the electronic dealer services system pursuant to
section 60-1507 at the time the purchaser makes application for the
registration of the motor vehicle, semitrailer, or trailer for operation
upon the highways of this state. The tax imposed by this section on motor
vehicles, semitrailers, and trailers registered pursuant to section
60-3,198 shall be collected by the Department of Motor Vehicles at the
time the purchaser makes application for the registration of the motor
vehicle, semitrailer, or trailer for operation upon the highways of this
state. At the time of the sale of any motor vehicle, semitrailer, or
trailer, the seller shall (i) state on the sales invoice the dollar
amount of the tax imposed under this section and (ii) furnish to the
purchaser a certified statement of the transaction, in such form as the
Tax Commissioner prescribes, setting forth as a minimum the total sales
price, the allowance for any trade-in, and the difference between the
two. The sales tax due shall be computed on the difference between the
total sales price and the allowance for any trade-in as disclosed by such
certified statement. Any seller who willfully understates the amount upon
which the sales tax is due shall be subject to a penalty of one thousand
dollars. A copy of such certified statement shall also be furnished to
the Tax Commissioner. Any seller who fails or refuses to furnish such
certified statement shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon
conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five
dollars nor more than one hundred dollars. If the purchaser does not
register such motor vehicle, semitrailer, or trailer for operation on the
highways of this state within thirty days of the purchase thereof, the
tax imposed by this section shall immediately thereafter be paid by the
purchaser to the county treasurer or the Department of Motor Vehicles. If
the tax is not paid on or before the thirtieth day after its purchase,
the county treasurer or Department of Motor Vehicles shall also collect
from the purchaser interest from the thirtieth day through the date of
payment and sales tax penalties as provided in the Nebraska Revenue Act
-22-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
of 1967. The county treasurer or Department of Motor Vehicles shall
report and remit the tax so collected to the Tax Commissioner by the
fifteenth day of the following month. The county treasurer, for his or
her collection fee, shall deduct and withhold, from all amounts required
to be collected under this subsection, the collection fee permitted to be
deducted by any retailer collecting the sales tax, all of which shall be
deposited in the county general fund, plus an additional amount equal to
one-half of one percent of all amounts in excess of six thousand dollars
remitted each month. Prior to January 1, 2023, fifty percent of such
additional amount shall be deposited in the county general fund and fifty
percent of such additional amount shall be deposited in the county road
fund. On and after January 1, 2023, seventy-five percent of such
additional amount shall be deposited in the county general fund and
twenty-five percent of such additional amount shall be deposited in the
county road fund. In any county with a population of one hundred fifty
thousand inhabitants or more, the county treasurer shall remit one dollar
of his or her collection fee for each of the first five thousand motor
vehicles, semitrailers, or trailers registered with such county treasurer
on or after January 1, 2020, to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund. The Department of Motor Vehicles,
for its collection fee, shall deduct, withhold, and deposit in the Motor
Carrier Division Cash Fund the collection fee permitted to be deducted by
any retailer collecting the sales tax. The collection fee for the county
treasurer or the Department of Motor Vehicles shall be forfeited if the
county treasurer or department violates any rule or regulation pertaining
to the collection of the use tax.
(j)(i) The tax imposed by this section on the sale of a motorboat as
defined in section 37-1204 shall be the liability of the purchaser. The
tax shall be collected by the county treasurer at the time the purchaser
makes application for the registration of the motorboat. At the time of
the sale of a motorboat, the seller shall (A) state on the sales invoice
-23-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
the dollar amount of the tax imposed under this section and (B) furnish
to the purchaser a certified statement of the transaction, in such form
as the Tax Commissioner prescribes, setting forth as a minimum the total
sales price, the allowance for any trade-in, and the difference between
the two. The sales tax due shall be computed on the difference between
the total sales price and the allowance for any trade-in as disclosed by
such certified statement. Any seller who willfully understates the amount
upon which the sales tax is due shall be subject to a penalty of one
thousand dollars. A copy of such certified statement shall also be
furnished to the Tax Commissioner. Any seller who fails or refuses to
furnish such certified statement shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and
shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less than
twenty-five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars. If the purchaser
does not register such motorboat within thirty days of the purchase
thereof, the tax imposed by this section shall immediately thereafter be
paid by the purchaser to the county treasurer. If the tax is not paid on
or before the thirtieth day after its purchase, the county treasurer
shall also collect from the purchaser interest from the thirtieth day
through the date of payment and sales tax penalties as provided in the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. The county treasurer shall report and remit
the tax so collected to the Tax Commissioner by the fifteenth day of the
following month. The county treasurer, for his or her collection fee,
shall deduct and withhold for the use of the county general fund, from
all amounts required to be collected under this subsection, the
collection fee permitted to be deducted by any retailer collecting the
sales tax. The collection fee shall be forfeited if the county treasurer
violates any rule or regulation pertaining to the collection of the use
tax.
(ii) In the rental or lease of motorboats, the tax shall be
collected by the lessor on the rental or lease price.
(k)(i) The tax imposed by this section on the sale of an all-terrain
-24-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
vehicle as defined in section 60-103 or a utility-type vehicle as defined
in section 60-135.01 shall be the liability of the purchaser. The tax
shall be collected by the county treasurer or by an approved licensed
dealer participating in the electronic dealer services system pursuant to
section 60-1507 at the time the purchaser makes application for the
certificate of title for the all-terrain vehicle or utility-type vehicle.
At the time of the sale of an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type
vehicle, the seller shall (A) state on the sales invoice the dollar
amount of the tax imposed under this section and (B) furnish to the
purchaser a certified statement of the transaction, in such form as the
Tax Commissioner prescribes, setting forth as a minimum the total sales
price, the allowance for any trade-in, and the difference between the
two. The sales tax due shall be computed on the difference between the
total sales price and the allowance for any trade-in as disclosed by such
certified statement. Any seller who willfully understates the amount upon
which the sales tax is due shall be subject to a penalty of one thousand
dollars. A copy of such certified statement shall also be furnished to
the Tax Commissioner. Any seller who fails or refuses to furnish such
certified statement shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon
conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five
dollars nor more than one hundred dollars. If the purchaser does not
obtain a certificate of title for such all-terrain vehicle or utility-
type vehicle within thirty days of the purchase thereof, the tax imposed
by this section shall immediately thereafter be paid by the purchaser to
the county treasurer. If the tax is not paid on or before the thirtieth
day after its purchase, the county treasurer shall also collect from the
purchaser interest from the thirtieth day through the date of payment and
sales tax penalties as provided in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. The
county treasurer shall report and remit the tax so collected to the Tax
Commissioner by the fifteenth day of the following month. The county
treasurer, for his or her collection fee, shall deduct and withhold for
-25-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
the use of the county general fund, from all amounts required to be
collected under this subsection, the collection fee permitted to be
deducted by any retailer collecting the sales tax. The collection fee
shall be forfeited if the county treasurer violates any rule or
regulation pertaining to the collection of the use tax.
(ii) In the rental or lease of an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-
type vehicle, the tax shall be collected by the lessor on the rental or
lease price.
(iii) County treasurers are appointed as sales and use tax
collectors for all sales of all-terrain vehicles or utility-type vehicles
made outside of this state to purchasers or users of all-terrain vehicles
or utility-type vehicles which are required to have a certificate of
title in this state. The county treasurer shall collect the applicable
use tax from the purchaser of an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type
vehicle purchased outside of this state at the time application for a
certificate of title is made. The full use tax on the purchase price
shall be collected by the county treasurer if a sales or occupation tax
was not paid by the purchaser in the state of purchase. If a sales or
occupation tax was lawfully paid in the state of purchase at a rate less
than the tax imposed in this state, use tax must be collected on the
difference as a condition for obtaining a certificate of title in this
state.
(l) The Tax Commissioner shall adopt and promulgate necessary rules
and regulations for determining the amount subject to the taxes imposed
by this section so as to insure that the full amount of any applicable
tax is paid in cases in which a sale is made of which a part is subject
to the taxes imposed by this section and a part of which is not so
subject and a separate accounting is not practical or economical.
(2) A use tax is hereby imposed on the storage, use, or other
consumption in this state of property purchased, leased, or rented from
any retailer and on any transaction the gross receipts of which are
-26-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section on or after June 1,
1967, for storage, use, or other consumption in this state at the rate
set as provided in subsection (1) of this section on the sales price of
the property or, in the case of leases or rentals, of the lease or rental
prices.
(a) Every person storing, using, or otherwise consuming in this
state property purchased from a retailer or leased or rented from another
person for such purpose shall be liable for the use tax at the rate in
effect when his or her liability for the use tax becomes certain under
the accounting basis used to maintain his or her books and records. His
or her liability shall not be extinguished until the use tax has been
paid to this state, except that a receipt from a retailer engaged in
business in this state or from a retailer who is authorized by the Tax
Commissioner, under such rules and regulations as he or she may
prescribe, to collect the sales tax and who is, for the purposes of the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 relating to the sales tax, regarded as a
retailer engaged in business in this state, which receipt is given to the
purchaser pursuant to subdivision (b) of this subsection, shall be
sufficient to relieve the purchaser from further liability for the tax to
which the receipt refers.
(b) Every retailer engaged in business in this state and selling,
leasing, or renting property for storage, use, or other consumption in
this state shall, at the time of making any sale, collect any tax which
may be due from the purchaser and shall give to the purchaser, upon
request, a receipt therefor in the manner and form prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner.
(c) The Tax Commissioner, in order to facilitate the proper
administration of the use tax, may designate such person or persons as he
or she may deem necessary to be use tax collectors and delegate to such
persons such authority as is necessary to collect any use tax which is
due and payable to the State of Nebraska. The Tax Commissioner may
-27-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
require of all persons so designated a surety bond in favor of the State
of Nebraska to insure against any misappropriation of state funds so
collected. The Tax Commissioner may require any tax official, city,
county, or state, to collect the use tax on behalf of the state. All
persons designated to or required to collect the use tax shall account
for such collections in the manner prescribed by the Tax Commissioner.
Nothing in this subdivision shall be so construed as to prevent the Tax
Commissioner or his or her employees from collecting any use taxes due
and payable to the State of Nebraska.
(d) All persons designated to collect the use tax and all persons
required to collect the use tax shall forward the total of such
collections to the Tax Commissioner at such time and in such manner as
the Tax Commissioner may prescribe. Such collectors of the use tax shall
deduct and withhold from the amount of taxes collected two and one-half
percent of the first three thousand dollars remitted each month as
reimbursement for the cost of collecting the tax. Any such deduction
shall be forfeited to the State of Nebraska if such collector violates
any rule, regulation, or directive of the Tax Commissioner.
(e) For the purpose of the proper administration of the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967 and to prevent evasion of the use tax, it shall be
presumed that property sold, leased, or rented by any person for delivery
in this state is sold, leased, or rented for storage, use, or other
consumption in this state until the contrary is established. The burden
of proving the contrary is upon the person who purchases, leases, or
rents the property.
(f) For the purpose of the proper administration of the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967 and to prevent evasion of the use tax, for the sale
of property to an advertising agency which purchases the property as an
agent for a disclosed or undisclosed principal, the advertising agency is
and remains liable for the sales and use tax on the purchase the same as
if the principal had made the purchase directly.
-28-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
Sec. 11. Section 77-2703.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2703.01 (1) The determination of whether a sale or use of
property or the provision of services is in this state, in a municipality
that has adopted a tax under the Local Option Revenue Act, or in a county
that has adopted a tax under section 13-319 or 77-6403 shall be governed
by the sourcing rules in sections 77-2703.01 to 77-2703.04.
(2) When the property or service is received by the purchaser at a
business location of the retailer, the sale is sourced to that business
location.
(3) When the property or service is not received by the purchaser at
a business location of the retailer, the sale is sourced to the location
where receipt by the purchaser or the purchaser's donee, designated as
such by the purchaser, occurs, including the location indicated by
instructions for delivery to the purchaser or donee, known to the
retailer.
(4) When subsection (2) or (3) of this section does not apply, the
sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address or other
information for the purchaser that is available from the business records
of the retailer that are maintained in the ordinary course of the
retailer's business when use of this address does not constitute bad
faith.
(5) When subsection (2), (3), or (4) of this section does not apply,
the sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser obtained during the consummation of the sale, including the
address of a purchaser's payment instrument, if no other address is
available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith.
(6) When subsection (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section does not
apply, including the circumstance in which the retailer is without
sufficient information to apply the rules in any such subsection, then
the location will be determined by the address from which property was
-29-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
shipped, from which the digital good was first available for transmission
by the retailer, or from which the service was provided disregarding for
these purposes any location that merely provided the digital transfer of
the product sold.
(7) The lease or rental of tangible personal property, other than
property identified in subsection (8) or (9) of this section, shall be
sourced as follows:
(a) For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic payments,
the first periodic payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in
accordance with the provisions of subsections (2) through (6) of this
section. Periodic payments made subsequent to the first payment are
sourced to the primary property location for each period covered by the
payment. The primary property location shall be as indicated by an
address for the property provided by the lessee that is available to the
lessor from its records maintained in the ordinary course of business
when use of this address does not constitute bad faith. The property
location shall not be altered by intermittent use at different locations,
such as use of business property that accompanies employees on business
trips and service calls; and
(b) For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic
payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in accordance
with the provisions of subsections (2) through (6) of this section.
This subsection does not affect the imposition or computation of
sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump-sum or accelerated
basis or on the acquisition of property for lease.
(8) The lease or rental of motor vehicles, trailers, semitrailers,
or aircraft that do not qualify as transportation equipment under
subsection (9) of this section shall be sourced as follows:
(a) For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic payments,
each periodic payment is sourced to the primary property location. The
primary property location shall be as indicated by an address for the
-30-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
property provided by the lessee that is available to the lessor from its
records maintained in the ordinary course of business when use of this
address does not constitute bad faith. This location shall not be altered
by intermittent use at different locations; and
(b) For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic
payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in accordance
with the provisions of subsections (2) through (6) of this section.
This subsection does not affect the imposition or computation of
sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump-sum or accelerated
basis or on the acquisition of property for lease.
(9) The retail sale, including lease or rental, of transportation
equipment shall be sourced the same as a retail sale in accordance with
subsections (2) through (6) of this section. Transportation equipment
means any of the following:
(a) Locomotives and railcars that are utilized for the carriage of
persons or property in interstate commerce;
(b) Trucks and truck-tractors with a gross vehicle weight rating of
ten thousand one pounds or greater, trailers, semitrailers, or passenger
buses that are (i) registered through the International Registration Plan
and (ii) operated under authority of a carrier authorized and
certificated by the United States Department of Transportation or another
federal authority to engage in the carriage of persons or property in
interstate commerce;
(c) Aircraft operated by air carriers authorized and certificated by
the United States Department of Transportation or another federal
authority or a foreign authority to engage in the carriage of persons or
property in interstate or foreign commerce; and
(d) Containers designed for use on and component parts attached or
secured on the items set forth in subdivisions (9)(a) through (c) of this
section.
(10) For purposes of this section, receive and receipt mean taking
-31-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
possession of tangible personal property, making first use of services,
or taking possession or making first use of digital goods, whichever
comes first. The terms receive and receipt do not include possession by a
shipping company on behalf of the purchaser. For purposes of sourcing
detective services subject to tax under subdivision (4)(h) of section
77-2701.16, making first use of a service shall be deemed to be at the
individual's residence, in the case of a customer who is an individual,
or at the principal place of business, in the case of a business
customer.
(11) The sale, not including lease or rental, of a motor vehicle,
semitrailer, or trailer as defined in the Motor Vehicle Registration Act
shall be sourced to the place of registration of the motor vehicle,
semitrailer, or trailer for operation upon the highways of this state or,
if no such registration has occurred, the place where such motor vehicle,
semitrailer, or trailer is required to be registered, except that
beginning January 1, 2021, the sale of any motor vehicle or trailer
operated by a public power district and registered under section 60-3,228
shall be sourced to the place where the motor vehicle or trailer has
situs as defined in section 60-349.
(12) The sale or lease for one year or more of motorboats shall be
sourced to the place of registration of the motorboat. The lease of
motorboats for less than one year shall be sourced to the point of
delivery.
Sec. 12. Section 77-2704.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.03 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of aircraft fuel
as defined under Chapter 3, article 1.
Sec. 13. Section 77-2704.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
-32-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
77-2704.04 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of minerals,
oil, and gas as defined under Chapter 57.
Sec. 14. Section 77-2704.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.05 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of motor vehicle
fuels as defined, taxed, or exempted under Chapter 66, article 4, diesel
fuel as taxed for use on the highways under Chapter 66, article 4,
compressed fuels as taxed for use on the highways under the Compressed
Fuel Tax Act, diesel and compressed fuels used to provide motive power
for railroad rolling stock, and diesel and compressed fuels delivered
into the fuel supply tanks of other vehicles.
Sec. 15. Section 77-2704.07, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.07 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of any newspaper
regularly issued at average intervals not exceeding one week if such
newspaper contains matters of general interest and reports of current
events.
Sec. 16. Section 77-2704.10, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.10 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of:
(1) Prepared food and food and food ingredients served by public or
private schools, school districts, student organizations, or parent-
teacher associations pursuant to an agreement with the proper school
-33-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
authorities, in an elementary or secondary school or at any institution
of higher education, public or private, during the regular school day or
at an approved function of any such school or institution. This exemption
does not apply to sales by an institution of higher education at any
facility or function which is open to the general public;
(2) Prepared food and food and food ingredients sold by a church at
a function of such church;
(3) Prepared food and food and food ingredients served to patients
and inmates of hospitals and other institutions licensed by the state for
the care of human beings;
(4) Fees and admissions charged for political events by ballot
question committees, candidate committees, independent committees, and
political party committees as defined in the Nebraska Political
Accountability and Disclosure Act;
(5) Prepared food and food and food ingredients sold to the elderly,
handicapped, or recipients of Supplemental Security Income by an
organization that actually accepts electronic benefits transfer under
regulations issued by the United States Department of Agriculture
although it is not necessary for the purchaser to use electronic benefits
transfer to pay for the prepared food and food and food ingredients;
(6) Fees and admissions charged by a public or private elementary or
secondary school and fees and admissions charged by a school district,
student organization, or parent-teacher association, pursuant to an
agreement with the proper school authorities, in a public or private
elementary or secondary school during the regular school day or at an
approved function of any such school;
(7) Fees and admissions charged for participants in any activity
provided by a nonprofit organization that is exempt from income tax under
section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, which
organization conducts statewide sport events with multiple sports for
both adults and youth; and
-34-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
(8) Fees and admissions charged for participants in any activity
provided by a nonprofit organization that is exempt from income tax under
section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, which
organization is affiliated with a national organization, primarily
dedicated to youth development and healthy living, and offers sports
instruction and sports leagues or sports events in multiple sports.
Sec. 17. Section 77-2704.12, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2704.12 (1) Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes
shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or
rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of
purchases by (a) any nonprofit organization created exclusively for
religious purposes, (b) any nonprofit organization providing services
exclusively to the blind, (c) any nonprofit private educational
institution established under sections 79-1601 to 79-1607, (d) any
accredited, nonprofit, privately controlled college or university with
its primary campus physically located in Nebraska, (e) any nonprofit (i)
hospital, (ii) health clinic when one or more hospitals or the parent
corporations of the hospitals own or control the health clinic for the
purpose of reducing the cost of health services or when the health clinic
receives federal funds through the United States Public Health Service
for the purpose of serving populations that are medically underserved,
(iii) skilled nursing facility, (iv) intermediate care facility, (v)
assisted-living facility, (vi) intermediate care facility for persons
with developmental disabilities, (vii) nursing facility, (viii) home
health agency, (ix) hospice or hospice service, (x) respite care service,
(xi) mental health substance use treatment center licensed under the
Health Care Facility Licensure Act, or (xii) center for independent
living as defined in 29 U.S.C. 796a, (f) any nonprofit licensed
residential child-caring agency, (g) any nonprofit licensed child-placing
agency, (h) any nonprofit organization certified by the Department of
-35-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
Health and Human Services to provide community-based services for persons
with developmental disabilities, (i) any nonprofit organization certified
or contracted by a regional behavioral health authority or the Division
of Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human Services to
provide community-based mental health or substance use services, or (j)
any nonprofit organization for purchases of property that will be
transferred to an organization listed in subdivisions (a) through (i) of
this subsection until the property is transferred or the contract is
completed, provided that the nonprofit organization (i) acquires property
that will be transferred to an organization listed in subdivisions (a)
through (i) of this subsection or (ii) enters into a contract of
construction, improvement, or repair upon property annexed to real estate
if the property will be transferred to an organization listed in
subdivisions (a) through (i) of this subsection.
(2) Any organization listed in subsection (1) of this section shall
apply for an exemption on forms provided by the Tax Commissioner. The
application shall be approved and a numbered certificate of exemption
received by the applicant organization in order to be exempt from the
sales and use tax.
(3) The appointment of purchasing agents shall be recognized for the
purpose of altering the status of the construction contractor as the
ultimate consumer of building materials which are physically annexed to
the structure and which subsequently belong to the owner of the
organization or institution. The appointment of purchasing agents shall
be in writing and occur prior to having any building materials annexed to
real estate in the construction, improvement, or repair. The contractor
who has been appointed as a purchasing agent may apply for a refund of or
use as a credit against a future use tax liability the tax paid on
inventory items annexed to real estate in the construction, improvement,
or repair of a project for a licensed not-for-profit institution.
(4) Any organization listed in subsection (1) of this section which
-36-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
enters into a contract of construction, improvement, or repair upon
property annexed to real estate without first issuing a purchasing agent
authorization to a contractor or repairperson prior to the building
materials being annexed to real estate in the project may apply to the
Tax Commissioner for a refund of any sales and use tax paid by the
contractor or repairperson on the building materials physically annexed
to real estate in the construction, improvement, or repair.
(5) Any person purchasing, storing, using, or otherwise consuming
building materials in the performance of any construction, improvement,
or repair by or for any institution enumerated in subsection (1) of this
section which is licensed upon completion although not licensed at the
time of construction or improvement, which building materials are annexed
to real estate and which subsequently belong to the owner of the
institution, shall pay any applicable sales or use tax thereon. Upon
becoming licensed and receiving a numbered certificate of exemption, the
institution organized not for profit shall be entitled to a refund of the
amount of taxes so paid in the performance of such construction,
improvement, or repair and shall submit whatever evidence is required by
the Tax Commissioner sufficient to establish the total sales and use tax
paid upon the building materials physically annexed to real estate in the
construction, improvement, or repair.
Sec. 18. Section 77-2704.13, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.13 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of:
(1) Sales and purchases of electricity, coal, gas, fuel oil, diesel
fuel, tractor fuel, propane, gasoline, coke, nuclear fuel, butane, wood
as fuel, and corn as fuel when more than fifty percent of the amount
purchased is for use directly in irrigation or farming;
(2) Sales and purchases of such energy sources or fuels when more
-37-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
than fifty percent of the amount purchased is for use directly in
processing, manufacturing, or refining, in the generation of electricity,
in the compression of natural gas for retail sale as a vehicle fuel, or
by any hospital. For purposes of this subdivision, processing includes
the drying and aerating of grain in commercial agricultural facilities;
and
(3) Sales and purchases of water used for irrigation of agricultural
lands and manufacturing purposes.
Sec. 19. Section 77-2704.14, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.14 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of the use of
coin-operated machines used for laundering and cleaning except the
cleaning or washing of motor vehicles.
Sec. 20. Section 77-2704.15, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2704.15 (1)(a) Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes
shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or
rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of
purchases by the state, including public educational institutions
recognized or established under the provisions of Chapter 85, or by any
county, township, city, village, rural or suburban fire protection
district, city airport authority, county airport authority, joint airport
authority, drainage district organized under sections 31-401 to 31-450,
sanitary drainage district organized under sections 31-501 to 31-553,
land bank created under the Nebraska Municipal Land Bank Act, natural
resources district, county agricultural society, elected county fair
board, housing agency as defined in section 71-1575 except for purchases
for any commercial operation that does not exclusively benefit the
residents of an affordable housing project, cemetery created under
-38-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
section 12-101, or joint entity or agency formed by any combination of
two or more counties, townships, cities, villages, or other exempt
governmental units pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act, the
Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, or the Joint Public Agency Act,
except for purchases for use in the business of furnishing gas, water,
electricity, or heat, or by any irrigation or reclamation district, the
irrigation division of any public power and irrigation district, or
public schools or learning communities established under Chapter 79.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, purchases by the state or by a
governmental unit listed in subdivision (a) of this subsection include
purchases by any nonprofit corporation under a lease-purchase agreement,
financing lease, or other instrument which provides for transfer of title
to the property to the state or governmental unit upon payment of all
amounts due thereunder. If any nonprofit corporation will be making
purchases under a lease-purchase agreement, financing lease, or other
instrument as part of a project with a total estimated cost that exceeds
the threshold amount, then such purchases shall qualify for an exemption
under this section only if the question of proceeding with such project
has been submitted at a primary, general, or special election held within
the governmental unit that will be a party to the lease-purchase
agreement, financing lease, or other instrument and has been approved by
the voters of such governmental unit or the governmental unit's
expenditure towards the project is paid in whole or in part with
redevelopment bonds. For purposes of this subdivision, (i) project means
the acquisition of real property or the construction of a public building
and (ii) threshold amount means the greater of fifty thousand dollars or
six-tenths of one percent of the total actual value of real and personal
property of the governmental unit that will be a party to the lease-
purchase agreement, financing lease, or other instrument as of the end of
the governmental unit's prior fiscal year.
(2) The appointment of purchasing agents shall be recognized for the
-39-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
purpose of altering the status of the construction contractor as the
ultimate consumer of building materials which are physically annexed to
the structure and which subsequently belong to the state or the
governmental unit. The appointment of purchasing agents shall be in
writing and occur prior to having any building materials annexed to real
estate in the construction, improvement, or repair. The contractor who
has been appointed as a purchasing agent may apply for a refund of or use
as a credit against a future use tax liability the tax paid on inventory
items annexed to real estate in the construction, improvement, or repair
of a project for the state or a governmental unit.
(3) Any governmental unit listed in subsection (1) of this section,
except the state, which enters into a contract of construction,
improvement, or repair upon property annexed to real estate without first
issuing a purchasing agent authorization to a contractor or repairperson
prior to the building materials being annexed to real estate in the
project may apply to the Tax Commissioner for a refund of any sales and
use tax paid by the contractor or repairperson on the building materials
physically annexed to real estate in the construction, improvement, or
repair.
Sec. 21. Section 77-2704.16, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.16 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of purchases
made by the Nebraska State Fair Board.
Sec. 22. Section 77-2704.17, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.17 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of purchases
made by the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority.
-40-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
Sec. 23. Section 77-2704.20, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2704.20 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of purchases
made by licensees of the State Racing and Gaming Commission.
Sec. 24. Section 77-2704.22, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.22 (1) Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes
shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or
rental and on the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of
manufacturing machinery and equipment.
(2) Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall not be
imposed on the gross receipts from the sale of installation, repair, and
maintenance services performed on or with respect to manufacturing
machinery and equipment.
Sec. 25. Section 77-2704.23, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.23 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of sales and
purchases of semen and insemination services for use in ranching or
farming or for commercial or industrial uses.
Sec. 26. Section 77-2704.24, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.24 (1) Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross
receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or
other consumption in this state of food or food ingredients except for
prepared food and food sold through vending machines.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Alcoholic beverages means beverages that are suitable for human
-41-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by
volume;
(b) Candy means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or
artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts, or
other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or pieces.
Candy does not include any preparation that contains flour or that
requires refrigeration;
(c) (b) Dietary supplement means any product, other than tobacco,
intended to supplement the diet that contains one or more of the
following dietary ingredients: (i) A vitamin, (ii) a mineral, (iii) an
herb or other botanical, (iv) an amino acid, (v) a dietary substance for
use by humans to supplement the diet by increasing the total dietary
intake, or (vi) a concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or
combination of any ingredients described in subdivisions (2)(c)(i) (2)(b)
(i) through (v) of this section; that is intended for ingestion in
tablet, capsule, powder, softgel, gelcap, or liquid form or, if not
intended for ingestion in such a form, is not presented as conventional
food and is not represented for use as a sole item of a meal or of the
diet; and that is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement,
identifiable by the supplemental facts box found on the label and as
required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. 101.36, as such regulation existed on
January 1, 2003;
(d) (c) Food and food ingredients means substances, whether in
liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that are
sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed for their taste
or nutritional value. Food and food ingredients does not include
alcoholic beverages, candy, dietary supplements, soft drinks, or tobacco;
(e) (d) Food sold through vending machines means food that is
dispensed from a machine or other mechanical device that accepts payment;
(f) (e) Prepared food means:
(i) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller, including
-42-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or straws. A plate
does not include a container or packaging used to transport the food; or
(ii) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller
for sale as a single item and food sold in a heated state or heated by
the seller, except:
(A) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the seller;
(B) Eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal
foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the federal
Food and Drug Administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of its Food Code,
as it existed on January 1, 2003, so as to prevent food borne illnesses;
(C) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American
Industry Classification System classification is manufacturing in sector
311, except subsector 3118, bakeries;
(D) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single
item;
(E) Bakery items, including bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels,
croissants, pastries, donuts, danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts,
muffins, bars, cookies, and tortillas; and
(F) Food that ordinarily requires additional cooking to finish the
product to its desired final condition; and
(g) Soft drinks means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural or
artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks does not include beverages that
contain milk or milk products, soy, rice, or similar milk substitutes or
that contain greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice by
volume; and
(h) (f) Tobacco means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe tobacco,
or any other item that contains tobacco.
Sec. 27. Section 77-2704.25, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.25 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
-43-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of property sold
by parent-booster clubs, parent-teacher associations, parent-teacher-
student associations, or school-operated stores approved by an elementary
or secondary school, public or private, if the proceeds from such sale
are used to support school activities or the school itself.
Sec. 28. Section 77-2704.26, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.26 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of an aircraft
delivered in this state to an individual who is a resident of another
state or any other person who has a business location in another state
when the aircraft is not to be registered or based in this state and it
will not remain in this state more than ten days. Sales and use taxes
shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from a service listed in
subsection (4) of section 77-2701.16 that is rendered to an aircraft
brought into this state by an individual who is a resident of another
state or any other person who has a business location in another state
when the aircraft is not to be registered or based in this state and it
will not remain in this state more than ten days after the service is
completed.
Sec. 29. Section 77-2704.27, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.27 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of,
the service to, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state
of railroad rolling stock whether owned by a railroad or by any other
person.
Sec. 30. Section 77-2704.28, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.28 Until January 1, 2027, a A lease of property from a
-44-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
subsidiary to the parent company, from a parent company to a subsidiary,
from one subsidiary to another subsidiary of the same parent company, or
between brother-sister companies shall not be subject to the sales and
use tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 if such property was
either originally acquired prior to June 1, 1967, or if acquired
thereafter, the seller or transferor directly or indirectly has
previously paid a sales or use tax thereon. Such lessor company shall
have the same sales and use tax liability on the purchase of property to
be leased to the lessee company as the lessee company would have paid if
the lessee company had purchased the property directly.
Sec. 31. Section 77-2704.30, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.30 The use tax imposed in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967
shall not apply to the : (1) The use in this state of materials and
replacement parts which are acquired outside this state and which are
moved into this state for use directly in the repair, installation, or
application and maintenance or manufacture of motor vehicles, watercraft,
railroad rolling stock, whether owned by a railroad or by any person,
whether a common or contract carrier or otherwise, or aircraft engaged as
common or contract carriers; and (2) The storage, use, or consumption of
property which is acquired outside this state, the sale, lease, or rental
or the storage, use, or consumption of which property and any associated
labor would be exempt from the sales or use tax were it purchased within
this state.
Sec. 32. Section 77-2704.36, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2704.36 (1) Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use tax shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of:
(a) Depreciable agricultural machinery and equipment purchased,
leased, or rented on or after January 1, 1993, for use in commercial
agriculture; or
-45-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
(b) Net wrap, baling wire, and twine purchased for use in commercial
agriculture.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a)(i) Agricultural machinery and equipment means tangible personal
property that is used directly in (A) cultivating or harvesting a crop,
(B) raising or caring for animal life, (C) protecting the health and
welfare of animal life, including fans, curtains, and climate control
equipment within livestock buildings, or (D) collecting or processing an
agricultural product on a farm or ranch, regardless of the degree of
attachment to any real property; and
(ii) Agricultural machinery and equipment includes, but is not
limited to, header trailers, head haulers, header transports, and seed
tender trailers and excludes any current tractor model as defined in
section 2-2701.01 not permitted for sale in Nebraska pursuant to sections
2-2701 to 2-2711;
(b) Baling wire means wire used in the baling of livestock feed or
bedding;
(c) Net wrap means plastic wrap used in the baling of livestock feed
or bedding; and
(d) Twine means a strong string of two or more strands twisted
together used in the baling of livestock feed or bedding.
Sec. 33. Section 77-2704.38, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.38 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of lottery
tickets purchased pursuant to the State Lottery Act.
Sec. 34. Section 77-2704.39, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.39 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, license, or
-46-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
rental of or the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of
personal property containing copyrighted material if the purchaser,
lessee, licensee, or renter is operating under a certificate from the
Federal Communications Commission and possesses such personal property
for rebroadcasting to the general public, regardless of whether the
property is in the form of satellite transmissions, films, records,
tapes, discs, or other media.
Sec. 35. Section 77-2704.40, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.40 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of molds, dies,
and patterns which have been specifically designed and fabricated to the
special order of the customer. This exemption shall not include
machinery, equipment, or tools to which molds, dies, and patterns have
been connected or attached in order to be used for their intended
purpose. For purposes of this section, molds, dies, and patterns shall
mean tools that are built specifically for manufacturing a single
product, which product is either injection molded from plastic or stamped
from metals.
Sec. 36. Section 77-2704.41, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.41 (1) Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes
shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or
rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of
feed, water, veterinary medicines, and agricultural chemicals for
consumption by, to be used on, or which are otherwise used in caring for
any form of animal life of a kind the products of which ordinarily
constitute food for human consumption or of a kind the pelts of which
ordinarily are used for human apparel.
(2) For purposes of this section:
-47-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
(a) Agricultural chemicals shall include insecticides, fungicides,
growth-regulating chemicals, and hormones;
(b) Feed shall include all grains, minerals, salts, proteins, fats,
fibers, vitamins, and grit commonly used as feed or feed supplements; and
(c) Veterinary medicines shall include medicines for the prevention
or treatment of disease or injury.
Sec. 37. Section 77-2704.42, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.42 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of copies of
public records as defined in section 84-712.01, except those documents
developed, produced, or acquired and made available for commercial sale
to the general public if the price or reproduction cost of the document
is not fixed by state law, rule, or regulation.
Sec. 38. Section 77-2704.45, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.45 Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross
receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or
other consumption in this state of property : (1) Property which will
enter into and become an ingredient or component part of property
manufactured, processed, or fabricated for ultimate sale at retail. ; or
(2) A service listed in subsection (4) of section 77-2701.16 which
will become an ingredient or component part of a service listed in
subsection (4) of section 77-2701.16 for ultimate sale at retail.
Sec. 39. Section 77-2704.46, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.46 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of:
(1) Any form of animal life of a kind the products of which
-48-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
ordinarily constitute food for human consumption. Animal life includes
live poultry, other species of game birds subject to permit and
regulation by the Game and Parks Commission, and livestock on the hoof
when sales are made by the grower, producer, feeder, or any person
engaged in the business of bartering, buying, or selling live poultry,
other species of game birds subject to permit and regulation by the Game
and Parks Commission, or livestock on the hoof;
(2) Seeds and annual plants, the products of which ordinarily
constitute food for human consumption and which seeds and annual plants
are sold to commercial producers of such products, and seed legumes, seed
grasses, and seed grains when sold to be used exclusively for
agricultural purposes;
(3) Agricultural chemicals, adjuvants, surfactants, bonding agents,
clays, oils, and any other additives or compatibility agents for use in
commercial agriculture and applied to land or crops and sold in any tax
period that has not been closed by the applicable statute of limitations.
Agricultural chemicals does not mean chemicals, adjuvants, surfactants,
bonding agents, clays, oils, and any other additives or compatibility
agents applied to harvested grains stored in commercial elevators; or
(4) Oxygen for use in aquaculture as defined in section 2-3804.01.
Sec. 40. Section 77-2704.47, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.47 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of:
(1) Nonreturnable containers when sold without contents to persons
who place contents in the container and sell the contents together with
the container;
(2) Containers when sold with contents if the sales price of the
contents is not required to be included in the measure of the taxes
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967; and
-49-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
(3) Returnable containers when sold with contents in connection with
a retail sale of the contents or when resold for refilling.
For purposes of this section, returnable containers means containers
of a kind customarily returned by the buyer of the contents for reuse.
All other containers are nonreturnable containers.
Sec. 41. Section 77-2704.48, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.48 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of property or
services the transfer of which to the consumer constitutes an occasional
sale or the transfer of which to the consumer is made by way of an
occasional sale.
Sec. 42. Section 77-2704.50, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.50 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state from the
purchase in this state or the purchase outside this state, with title
passing in this state, of materials and replacement parts and any
associated labor used as or used directly in the repair and maintenance
or manufacture of railroad rolling stock, whether owned by a railroad or
by any person, whether a common or contract carrier or otherwise, motor
vehicles, watercraft, or aircraft engaged as common or contract carriers
or the purchase in such manner of motor vehicles, watercraft, or aircraft
to be used as common or contract carriers. All purchasers seeking to take
advantage of the exemption shall apply to the Tax Commissioner for a
common or contract carrier exemption. All common or contract carrier
exemption certificates shall expire on October 31, 2013, and on October
31 every five years thereafter. All persons seeking to continue to take
advantage of the common or contract carrier exemption shall apply for a
-50-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
new certificate at the expiration of the prior certificate. The Tax
Commissioner shall notify such exemption certificate holders at least
sixty days prior to the expiration date of such certificate that the
certificate will expire and be null and void as of such date.
Sec. 43. Section 77-2704.51, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.51 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of:
(1) Telecommunications service between telecommunications companies,
including division of revenue, settlements, or carrier access charges; or
(2) Dark fiber as defined in section 86-574 between
telecommunications companies.
Sec. 44. Section 77-2704.52, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.52 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of services
rendered using a prepaid calling service or a prepaid wireless calling
service.
Sec. 45. Section 77-2704.53, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.53 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state from the sale or
rental of videotape and film rentals, satellite programming, and
satellite programming service when the sales tax or the admission tax is
charged under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 and except as provided in
section 77-2704.39.
Sec. 46. Section 77-2704.56, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
-51-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
77-2704.56 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of purchases of
property as defined in subdivision (8) of section 51-702 or fine art by
any museum as defined in subdivision (6) of section 51-702.
Sec. 47. Section 77-2704.57, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.57 (1) Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use tax shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
personal property for use in a C-BED project or community-based energy
development project. This exemption shall be conditioned upon filing
requirements for the exemption as imposed by the Tax Commissioner. The
requirements imposed by the Tax Commissioner shall be related to ensuring
that the property purchased qualifies for the exemption. The Tax
Commissioner may require the filing of the documents showing compliance
with section 70-1907, the organization of the project, the distribution
of the payments, the power purchase agreements, the project pro forma,
articles of incorporation, operating agreements, and any amendments or
changes to these documents during the life of the power purchase
agreement.
(2) The Tax Commissioner shall notify an electric supplier that has
a power purchase agreement with a C-BED project if there is a change in
project ownership which makes the project no longer eligible as a C-BED
project. Purchase of a C-BED project by an electric supplier prior to the
end of the power purchase agreement disqualifies the C-BED project for
the exemption, but the Department of Revenue may not recover the amount
of the sales and use tax that was not paid by the project prior to the
purchase.
(3) For purposes of this section, the terms (a) C-BED project or
community-based energy development project, (b) electric supplier, (c)
gross power purchase agreement payments, (d) payments to the local
-52-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
community, and (e) qualified owner have the definitions found in section
70-1903.
(4) The Department of Revenue may examine the actual payments and
the distribution of the payments to determine if the projected
distributions were met. If the payment distributions to qualified owners
do not meet the requirements of this section, the department may recover
the amount of the sales or use tax that was not paid by the project at
any time up until the end of three years after the end of the power
purchase agreement.
(5) At any time prior to the end of the power purchase agreements,
the project may voluntarily surrender the exemption granted by the Tax
Commissioner and pay the amount of sales and use tax that would otherwise
have been due.
(6) The amount of the tax due under either subsection (4) or (5) of
this section shall be increased by interest at the rate specified in
section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted, from
the date the tax would have been due if no exemption was granted until
the date paid.
Sec. 48. Section 77-2704.58, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.58 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, use, or other
consumption in this state of depositions, bills of exceptions, and
transcripts or copies of such depositions, bills of exceptions, and
transcripts prepared and sold by a court reporter.
Sec. 49. Section 77-2704.60, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.60 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of mineral oil
to be applied to grain as a dust suppressant.
-53-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
Sec. 50. Section 77-2704.61, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.61 (1) Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes
shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or
rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of
biochips used for the purposes of conducting genotyping or the analysis
of gene expression, protein expression, genomic sequencing, or protein
profiling of plants, animals, or nonhuman laboratory research model
organisms.
(2) For purposes of this section, a biochip is a solid substrate
upon or into which is incorporated specific genetic or protein
information or chemicals that are queried through one or more chemical
interactions allowing (a) an isolation of one or more single nucleotide
polymorphisms which constitute an animal or plant genotype, (b) an
expression profile which measures activity of genes or the presence of
proteins, or (c) a detailed genomic sequence or protein profile. The
specific genetic or protein information or chemicals incorporated upon or
into the biochip are consumed in the process of conducting the analysis.
Sec. 51. Section 77-2704.62, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.62 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of tangible
personal property and services acquired by a person operating a data
center located in this state that are assembled, engineered, processed,
fabricated, manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated into other
tangible personal property for the purpose of subsequent use at a
physical location outside this state. Such exemption extends to keeping,
retaining, or exercising any right or power over such tangible personal
property in this state for the purpose of subsequently transporting it
outside this state for use thereafter outside this state.
-54-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
Sec. 52. Section 77-2704.63, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.63 (1) Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes
shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, use, or other
consumption of amounts charged to participate in a youth sports event,
youth sports league, or youth competitive educational activity by
political subdivisions or organizations that are exempt from income tax
under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Competitive educational activity means a tournament or a single
competition that occurs over a limited period of time annually or
intermittently where the participants engage in a competitive educational
activity;
(b) Sports event means a tournament or a single competition that
occurs over a limited period of time annually or intermittently where the
participants engage in a sport;
(c) Sports league means an organized series of sports competitions
taking place over several weeks or months between teams or individuals
that are members of the league; and
(d) Youth sports event, youth sports league, or youth competitive
educational activity means an event, league, or activity that is
restricted to participants who are less than nineteen years of age.
Sec. 53. Section 77-2704.64, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.64 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of repair or
replacement parts for agricultural machinery and equipment used in
commercial agriculture.
Sec. 54. Section 77-2704.65, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
-55-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
77-2704.65 (1) Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes
shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or
rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of
purchases by any historic automobile museum of items which are displayed
or held for display by such historic automobile museum and which are
reasonably related to the general purpose of such historic automobile
museum.
(2) For purposes of this section, historic automobile museum means a
museum as defined in section 51-702 that:
(a) Is used to maintain and exhibit to the public a collection of at
least one hundred fifty motor vehicles; and
(b) Was open to the public an average of four or more hours per week
during the previous calendar year.
(3) A museum in its first year of existence may qualify as a
historic automobile museum under this section without complying with
subdivision (2)(b) of this section if all other requirements of
subsection (2) of this section are met.
(4) If a museum that has claimed an exemption under this section
fails to qualify as a historic automobile museum, such museum shall be
subject to a deficiency determination under section 77-2709 and notice of
such deficiency determination may be served or mailed within the
applicable period provided in subdivision (5)(c) of section 77-2709.
Sec. 55. Section 77-2704.67, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.67 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of any sale of a
membership in or an admission to or any purchase by a nationally
accredited zoo or aquarium operated by a public agency or nonprofit
corporation primarily for educational, scientific, or tourism purposes.
Sec. 56. Section 77-2704.68, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-56-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
2024, is amended to read:
77-2704.68 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of residential
water service.
Sec. 57. Section 77-2704.69, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2704.69 Until January 1, 2027, sales Sales and use taxes shall
not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of
and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of all
catalysts, chemicals, and materials used in the process of manufacturing
ethyl alcohol and the production of coproducts.
Sec. 58. Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross
receipts from the following services enumerated in the Standard
Industrial Classification Manual, 1987, as prepared by the Statistical
Policy Division of the Office of Management and Budget, Office of the
President: Health services, major group 80.
Sec. 59. Section 77-2706, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-2706 (1) A resale certificate may be given by a purchaser who at
the time of purchasing the property intends to sell, lease, or rent it in
the regular course of business. A seller making repeated sales of the
same type to the same purchaser shall not be required to take a separate
resale certificate for each individual sale, but may, at his or her own
risk, take a blanket certificate covering all such sales made to the same
purchaser.
(2) The resale certificate shall be on such form and require the
furnishing of such information as the Tax Commissioner may require by
rule and regulation.
(3) If a purchaser who gives a resale certificate makes any use of
the property other than retention, demonstration, or display while
-57-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
holding it for sale, lease, or rental in the regular course of business,
the use shall be taxable to the purchaser as of the time when the
property is first so used and the sales price of the property to him or
her shall be deemed the measure of the tax.
(4) Any person who gives a resale certificate to the seller for
property which he or she knows, at the time of purchase, is purchased for
the purpose of use rather than for the purpose of resale, lease, or
rental by him or her in the regular course of business and each officer
of any corporation which so gives a resale certificate shall be guilty of
a misdemeanor.
(5) If a purchaser gives a resale certificate with respect to the
purchase of tangible goods and thereafter commingles such goods with
other tangible goods not so purchased but of such similarity that the
identity of the constituent goods in the commingled mass cannot be
determined, sales from the mass of commingled goods shall be deemed to be
sales of the goods covered by the resale certificate until a quantity of
commingled goods equal to the quantity of such goods so commingled has
been sold.
(6) Until January 1, 2027, any Any person, firm, or corporation
engaged in multistate operations and engaged as a common or contract
carrier may apply to the Tax Commissioner for an exemption certificate
which will permit such person or corporation to make purchases of any
nature within this state or without this state and bring such purchases
into this state for use both within and without this state, for storage
in this state, and when withdrawn from storage to be used within or
without the state without paying the sales or use tax thereon, until such
articles, materials, or supplies or finished products are placed in use
within this state. When such articles, materials, supplies, or finished
products are used within this state, a person to whom such exemption
certificate has been issued shall, on the last day of the first following
month after which such articles, materials, supplies, or finished
-58-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
products are put to use within this state, make a report to the Tax
Commissioner as to the amount of use or sales tax, if any, which is due
the state and make the payments to the state at the time of making the
return. If the Tax Commissioner, after investigation, finds that the
applicant maintains satisfactory books of account and that granting such
exemption would not result in the evasion or avoidance of any tax
otherwise properly due, he or she shall issue such exemption certificate.
Any person granted such an exemption certificate shall furnish a copy
thereof to any vendor from whom purchases are made and such vendor may
deliver any such purchases to the holder of any such certificate without
collection of any such sales tax. The fee for such exemption certificate
shall be ten dollars. The revenue from such fees shall be placed in the
General Fund.
(7) If any person, firm, corporation, association, or the agent
thereof presents a resale certificate to the seller for property which is
purchased for a use other than for resale, lease, or rental by him or her
in the regular course of business, the Tax Commissioner may impose,
assess, and collect from the purchaser or the agent thereof a penalty of
one hundred dollars or ten times the tax, whichever amount is larger, for
each instance of such presentation and misuse of a resale certificate.
This amount shall be in addition to any tax, interest, or penalty
otherwise imposed.
Any report, name, or information which is supplied to the Tax
Commissioner regarding a violation specified in this section, including
the identity of the informer, shall be subject to the pertinent
provisions regarding wrongful disclosure in section 77-2711.
Sec. 60. Section 77-2706.02, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-2706.02 (1) This section applies on and after July 1, 2026, and
until January 1, 2027.
(2) The appointment of purchasing agents shall be recognized for the
-59-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
purpose of permitting a construction contractor to purchase materials tax
free based on the buyer-based exemption of the contractor's client for
items that are physically annexed to the structure and which subsequently
belong to the client who is eligible for the buyer-based exemption. The
appointment of purchasing agents shall be in writing and occur prior to
having any buyer-based tax-exempt items annexed to real estate in the
construction, improvement, or repair. The contractor who has been
appointed as a purchasing agent may purchase the materials tax free or
may apply for a refund of or use as a credit against a future use tax
liability the tax paid on inventory items annexed to real estate in the
construction, improvement, or repair of a project that belongs to the
client who is eligible for the buyer-based exemption.
(3) A client described in subsection (2) of this section which
enters into a contract of construction, improvement, or repair with
respect to buyer-based tax-exempt items annexed to real estate without
first issuing a purchasing agent authorization to a construction
contractor prior to such items being annexed to real estate in the
project may apply to the Tax Commissioner for a refund of any sales and
use tax paid by the contractor on such items physically annexed to real
estate in the construction, improvement, or repair.
(4) For purposes of this section, client means a nonprofit entity.
Sec. 61. Section 77-27,132, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-27,132 (1) There is hereby created a fund to be designated the
Revenue Distribution Fund which shall be set apart and maintained by the
Tax Commissioner. Revenue not required to be credited to the General Fund
or any other specified fund may be credited to the Revenue Distribution
Fund. Credits and refunds of such revenue shall be paid from the Revenue
Distribution Fund. The balance of the amount credited, after credits and
refunds, shall be allocated as provided by the statutes creating such
revenue.
-60-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
(2) The Tax Commissioner shall pay to a depository bank designated
by the State Treasurer all amounts collected under the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967. The Tax Commissioner shall present to the State Treasurer
bank receipts showing amounts so deposited in the bank, and of the
amounts so deposited the State Treasurer shall:
(a)(i) For transactions occurring on or after October 1, 2014, and
before July 1, 2024, credit to the Game and Parks Commission Capital
Maintenance Fund all of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes imposed
pursuant to section 77-2703 on the sale or lease of motorboats as defined
in section 37-1204, personal watercraft as defined in section 37-1204.01,
all-terrain vehicles as defined in section 60-103, and utility-type
vehicles as defined in section 60-135.01; and
(ii) For transactions occurring on or after July 1, 2024, credit to
the Game and Parks Commission Capital Maintenance Fund all of the
proceeds of the sales and use taxes imposed pursuant to section 77-2703
on the sale or lease of motorboats as defined in section 37-1204,
personal watercraft as defined in section 37-1204.01, all-terrain
vehicles as defined in section 60-103, and utility-type vehicles as
defined in section 60-135.01, and from such proceeds, transfers shall be
made to the Nebraska Emergency Medical System Operations Fund as provided
in section 37-327.02;
(b) Credit to the Highway Trust Fund all of the proceeds of the
sales and use taxes derived from the sale or lease for periods of more
than thirty-one days of motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers,
except that the proceeds equal to any sales tax rate provided for in
section 77-2701.02 that is in excess of five percent derived from the
sale or lease for periods of more than thirty-one days of motor vehicles,
trailers, and semitrailers shall be credited to the Highway Allocation
Fund;
(c) For transactions occurring on or after July 1, 2013, and before
July 1, 2042, of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes derived from
-61-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
transactions other than those listed in subdivisions (2)(a), (b), and (e)
of this section from a sales tax rate of one-quarter of one percent,
credit monthly eighty-five percent to the Highway Trust Fund and fifteen
percent to the Highway Allocation Fund;
(d) Of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes derived from
transactions other than those listed in subdivisions (2)(a), (b), and (e)
of this section, credit to the Property Tax Credit Cash Fund the amount
certified under section 77-27,237, if any such certification is made; and
(e) For transactions occurring on or after July 1, 2023, credit to
the Department of Transportation Aeronautics Capital Improvement Fund all
of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes imposed pursuant to section
77-2703 on the sale or lease of aircraft as defined in section 3-101;
and .
(f) For transactions occurring on or after January 1, 2027, credit
to the New School Relief Fund an amount equal to the increase in sales
and use tax revenue received as a result of the changes made by this
legislative bill. The amount to be credited under this subdivision shall
be determined annually by the Tax Commissioner on or before July 1.
The balance of all amounts collected under the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967 shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 62. Section 77-27,235, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-27,235 (1) Any producer of electricity generated by a new
renewable electric generation facility shall earn a renewable energy tax
credit. For electricity generated on or after July 14, 2006, and before
October 1, 2007, the credit shall be .075 cent for each kilowatt-hour of
electricity generated by a new renewable electric generation facility.
For electricity generated on or after October 1, 2007, and before January
1, 2010, the credit shall be .1 cent for each kilowatt-hour of
electricity generated by a new renewable electric generation facility.
For electricity generated on or after January 1, 2010, and before January
-62-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
1, 2013, the credit shall be .075 cent per kilowatt-hour for electricity
generated by a new renewable electric generation facility. For
electricity generated on or after January 1, 2013, the credit shall be
.05 cent per kilowatt-hour for electricity generated by a new renewable
electric generation facility. The credit may be earned for production of
electricity for ten years after the date that the facility is placed in
operation on or after July 14, 2006.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Electricity generated by a new renewable electric generation
facility means electricity that is exclusively produced by a new
renewable electric generation facility;
(b) Eligible renewable resources means wind, moving water, solar,
geothermal, fuel cell, methane gas, or photovoltaic technology; and
(c) New renewable electric generation facility means an electrical
generating facility located in this state that is first placed into
service on or after July 14, 2006, which utilizes eligible renewable
resources as its fuel source.
(3) The credit allowed under this section may be used to reduce the
producer's Nebraska income tax liability or to obtain a refund of state
sales and use taxes paid by the producer of electricity generated by a
new renewable electric generation facility. A claim to use the credit for
refund of the state sales and use taxes paid, either directly or
indirectly, by the producer may be filed quarterly for electricity
generated during the previous quarter by the twentieth day of the month
following the end of the calendar quarter. The credit may be used to
obtain a refund of state sales and use taxes paid during the quarter
immediately preceding the quarter in which the claim for refund is made,
except that the amount refunded under this subsection shall not exceed
the amount of the state sales and use taxes paid during the quarter.
(4) The Department of Revenue may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to permit verification of the validity and timeliness of any
-63-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
renewable energy tax credit claimed.
(5) The total amount of renewable energy tax credits that may be
used by all taxpayers shall be limited to fifty thousand dollars without
further authorization from the Legislature.
(6) The credit allowed under this section may not be claimed by a
producer who received a sales tax exemption under section 77-2704.57 for
the new renewable electric generation facility.
(6) (7) Interest shall not be allowed on any refund paid under this
section.
Sec. 63. Section 77-3442, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-3442 (1) Property tax levies for the support of local governments
for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 1998, shall be limited to
the amounts set forth in this section except as provided in section
77-3444.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (2)(b) and (2)(e) of this
section, school districts and multiple-district school systems may levy a
maximum levy of:
(i) For fiscal years prior to fiscal year 2027-28, one dollar and
five cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property
subject to the levy; .
(ii) For fiscal year 2027-28, eighty-five cents per one hundred
dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy; and
(iii) For fiscal year 2028-29 and each fiscal year thereafter, sixty
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy.
(b) For each fiscal year prior to fiscal year 2017-18, learning
communities may levy a maximum levy for the general fund budgets of
member school districts of ninety-five cents per one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation of property subject to the levy. The proceeds from the
levy pursuant to this subdivision shall be distributed pursuant to
-64-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
section 79-1073.
(c) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(e) of this section, for
each fiscal year prior to fiscal year 2017-18, school districts that are
members of learning communities may levy for purposes of such districts'
general fund budget and special building funds a maximum combined levy of
the difference of one dollar and five cents on each one hundred dollars
of taxable property subject to the levy minus the learning community levy
pursuant to subdivision (2)(b) of this section for such learning
community.
(d) Excluded from the limitations in subdivisions (2)(a) and (2)(c)
of this section are (i) amounts levied to pay for current and future sums
agreed to be paid by a school district to certificated employees in
exchange for a voluntary termination of employment occurring prior to
September 1, 2017, (ii) amounts levied by a school district otherwise at
the maximum levy pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this section to pay
for current and future qualified voluntary termination incentives for
certificated teachers pursuant to subsection (3) of section 79-8,142 that
are not otherwise included in an exclusion pursuant to subdivision (2)(d)
of this section, (iii) amounts levied by a school district otherwise at
the maximum levy pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this section to pay
for seventy-five percent of the current and future sums agreed to be paid
to certificated employees in exchange for a voluntary termination of
employment occurring between September 1, 2017, and August 31, 2018, as a
result of a collective-bargaining agreement in force and effect on
September 1, 2017, that are not otherwise included in an exclusion
pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of this section, (iv) amounts levied by a
school district otherwise at the maximum levy pursuant to subdivision (2)
(a) of this section to pay for fifty percent of the current and future
sums agreed to be paid to certificated employees in exchange for a
voluntary termination of employment occurring between September 1, 2018,
and August 31, 2019, as a result of a collective-bargaining agreement in
-65-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
force and effect on September 1, 2017, that are not otherwise included in
an exclusion pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of this section, (v) amounts
levied by a school district otherwise at the maximum levy pursuant to
subdivision (2)(a) of this section to pay for twenty-five percent of the
current and future sums agreed to be paid to certificated employees in
exchange for a voluntary termination of employment occurring between
September 1, 2019, and August 31, 2020, as a result of a collective-
bargaining agreement in force and effect on September 1, 2017, that are
not otherwise included in an exclusion pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of
this section, (vi) amounts levied in compliance with sections 79-10,110
and 79-10,110.02, (vii) amounts levied pursuant to section 71 of this
act, and (viii) (vii) amounts levied to pay for special building funds
and sinking funds established for projects commenced prior to April 1,
1996, for construction, expansion, or alteration of school district
buildings. For purposes of this subsection, commenced means any action
taken by the school board on the record which commits the board to expend
district funds in planning, constructing, or carrying out the project.
(e) Federal aid school districts may exceed the maximum levy
prescribed by subdivision (2)(a) or (2)(c) of this section only to the
extent necessary to qualify to receive federal aid pursuant to Title VIII
of Public Law 103-382, as such title existed on September 1, 2001. For
purposes of this subdivision, federal aid school district means any
school district which receives ten percent or more of the revenue for its
general fund budget from federal government sources pursuant to Title
VIII of Public Law 103-382, as such title existed on September 1, 2001.
(f) For each fiscal year, learning communities may levy a maximum
levy of one-half cent on each one hundred dollars of taxable property
subject to the levy for elementary learning center facility leases, for
remodeling of leased elementary learning center facilities, and for up to
fifty percent of the estimated cost for focus school or program capital
projects approved by the learning community coordinating council pursuant
-66-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
to section 79-2111.
(g) For each fiscal year, learning communities may levy a maximum
levy of one and one-half cents on each one hundred dollars of taxable
property subject to the levy for early childhood education programs for
children in poverty, for elementary learning center employees, for
contracts with other entities or individuals who are not employees of the
learning community for elementary learning center programs and services,
and for pilot projects, except that no more than ten percent of such levy
may be used for elementary learning center employees.
(3) For each fiscal year through fiscal year 2023-24, community
college areas may levy the levies provided in subdivisions (2)(a) through
(c) of section 85-1517, in accordance with the provisions of such
subdivisions. For fiscal year 2024-25 and each fiscal year thereafter,
community college areas may levy the levies provided in subdivisions (2)
(a) and (b) of section 85-1517, in accordance with the provisions of such
subdivisions. A community college area may exceed the levy provided in
subdivision (2)(a) of section 85-1517 by the amount necessary to generate
sufficient revenue as described in section 85-1543 or 85-2238. A
community college area may exceed the levy provided in subdivision (2)(b)
of section 85-1517 by the amount necessary to retire general obligation
bonds assumed by the community college area or issued pursuant to section
85-1515 according to the terms of such bonds or for any obligation
pursuant to section 85-1535 entered into prior to January 1, 1997.
(4)(a) Natural resources districts may levy a maximum levy of four
and one-half cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of
property subject to the levy.
(b) Natural resources districts shall also have the power and
authority to levy a tax equal to the dollar amount by which their
restricted funds budgeted to administer and implement ground water
management activities and integrated management activities under the
Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act exceed their
-67-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
restricted funds budgeted to administer and implement ground water
management activities and integrated management activities for FY2003-04,
not to exceed one cent on each one hundred dollars of taxable valuation
annually on all of the taxable property within the district.
(c) In addition, natural resources districts located in a river
basin, subbasin, or reach that has been determined to be fully
appropriated pursuant to section 46-714 or designated as overappropriated
pursuant to section 46-713 by the Chief Water Officer of the Department
of Water, Energy, and Environment shall also have the power and authority
to levy a tax equal to the dollar amount by which their restricted funds
budgeted to administer and implement ground water management activities
and integrated management activities under the Nebraska Ground Water
Management and Protection Act exceed their restricted funds budgeted to
administer and implement ground water management activities and
integrated management activities for FY2005-06, not to exceed three cents
on each one hundred dollars of taxable valuation on all of the taxable
property within the district for fiscal year 2006-07 and each fiscal year
thereafter through fiscal year 2017-18.
(5) Any educational service unit authorized to levy a property tax
pursuant to section 79-1225 may levy a maximum levy of one and one-half
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy.
(6)(a) Incorporated cities and villages which are not within the
boundaries of a municipal county may levy a maximum levy of forty-five
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy plus an additional five cents per one hundred dollars of taxable
valuation to provide financing for the municipality's share of revenue
required under an agreement or agreements executed pursuant to the
Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act. The maximum
levy shall include amounts levied to pay for sums to support a library
pursuant to section 51-201, museum pursuant to section 51-501, visiting
-68-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
community nurse, home health nurse, or home health agency pursuant to
section 71-1637, or statue, memorial, or monument pursuant to section
80-202.
(b) Incorporated cities and villages which are within the boundaries
of a municipal county may levy a maximum levy of ninety cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy. The
maximum levy shall include amounts paid to a municipal county for county
services, amounts levied to pay for sums to support a library pursuant to
section 51-201, a museum pursuant to section 51-501, a visiting community
nurse, home health nurse, or home health agency pursuant to section
71-1637, or a statue, memorial, or monument pursuant to section 80-202.
(7) Sanitary and improvement districts which have been in existence
for more than five years may levy a maximum levy of forty cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy, and
sanitary and improvement districts which have been in existence for five
years or less shall not have a maximum levy. Unconsolidated sanitary and
improvement districts which have been in existence for more than five
years and are located in a municipal county may levy a maximum of eighty-
five cents per hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject
to the levy.
(8) Counties may levy or authorize a maximum levy of fifty cents per
one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy,
except that five cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of
property subject to the levy may only be levied to provide financing for
the county's share of revenue required under an agreement or agreements
executed pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public
Agency Act. The maximum levy shall include amounts levied to pay for sums
to support a library pursuant to section 51-201 or museum pursuant to
section 51-501. The county may allocate up to fifteen cents of its
authority to other political subdivisions subject to allocation of
property tax authority under subsection (1) of section 77-3443 and not
-69-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
specifically covered in this section to levy taxes as authorized by law
which do not collectively exceed fifteen cents per one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation on any parcel or item of taxable property. The county
may allocate to one or more other political subdivisions subject to
allocation of property tax authority by the county under subsection (1)
of section 77-3443 some or all of the county's five cents per one hundred
dollars of valuation authorized for support of an agreement or agreements
to be levied by the political subdivision for the purpose of supporting
that political subdivision's share of revenue required under an agreement
or agreements executed pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the
Joint Public Agency Act. If an allocation by a county would cause another
county to exceed its levy authority under this section, the second county
may exceed the levy authority in order to levy the amount allocated.
(9) Municipal counties may levy or authorize a maximum levy of one
dollar per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject
to the levy. The municipal county may allocate levy authority to any
political subdivision or entity subject to allocation under section
77-3443.
(10) Beginning July 1, 2016, rural and suburban fire protection
districts may levy a maximum levy of ten and one-half cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy if
(a) such district is located in a county that had a levy pursuant to
subsection (8) of this section in the previous year of at least forty
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy or (b) such district had a levy request pursuant to section
77-3443 in any of the three previous years and the county board of the
county in which the greatest portion of the valuation of such district is
located did not authorize any levy authority to such district in such
year.
(11) A regional metropolitan transit authority may levy a maximum
levy of ten cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of
-70-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
property subject to the levy for each fiscal year that commences on the
January 1 that follows the effective date of the conversion of the
transit authority established under the Transit Authority Law into the
regional metropolitan transit authority.
(12) Property tax levies (a) for judgments, except judgments or
orders from the Commission of Industrial Relations, obtained against a
political subdivision which require or obligate a political subdivision
to pay such judgment, to the extent such judgment is not paid by
liability insurance coverage of a political subdivision, (b) for
preexisting lease-purchase contracts approved prior to July 1, 1998, (c)
for bonds as defined in section 10-134 approved according to law and
secured by a levy on property except as provided in section 44-4317 for
bonded indebtedness issued by educational service units and school
districts, (d) for payments by a public airport to retire interest-free
loans from the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of
Transportation in lieu of bonded indebtedness at a lower cost to the
public airport, and (e) to pay for cancer benefits provided on or after
January 1, 2022, pursuant to the Firefighter Cancer Benefits Act are not
included in the levy limits established by this section.
(13) The limitations on tax levies provided in this section are to
include all other general or special levies provided by law.
Notwithstanding other provisions of law, the only exceptions to the
limits in this section are those provided by or authorized by sections
77-3442 to 77-3444.
(14) Tax levies in excess of the limitations in this section shall
be considered unauthorized levies under section 77-1606 unless approved
under section 77-3444.
(15) For purposes of sections 77-3442 to 77-3444, political
subdivision means a political subdivision of this state and a county
agricultural society.
(16) For school districts that file a binding resolution on or
-71-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
before May 9, 2008, with the county assessors, county clerks, and county
treasurers for all counties in which the school district has territory
pursuant to subsection (7) of section 79-458, if the combined levies,
except levies for bonded indebtedness approved by the voters of the
school district and levies for the refinancing of such bonded
indebtedness, are in excess of the greater of (a) one dollar and twenty
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy or (b) the maximum levy authorized by a vote pursuant to section
77-3444, all school district levies, except levies for bonded
indebtedness approved by the voters of the school district and levies for
the refinancing of such bonded indebtedness, shall be considered
unauthorized levies under section 77-1606.
Sec. 64. Section 77-4403, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-4403 For purposes of the Good Life Transformational Projects Act:
(1) Additional good life district retailer means a for-profit, as
described in subdivision (8)(c) of this section, retailer that opens a
new location in a good life district, has retail space at the time the
good life district was established within the good life district or
within forty miles of the district, and maintains the new location within
the good life district plus all locations existing at the time the good
life district was established within the good life district or within
forty miles of the district for three years from the date when the
additional good life district retailer first located within the good life
district. If the number of locations within the good life district or
within forty miles of the district falls below the number required to be
an additional good life district retailer but is at least equal to the
number that existed at the time the good life district was established
within three years, such retailer shall qualify as a relocated good life
district retailer subject to the restrictions and requirements of
subdivision (14) of this section. The term includes a related person;
-72-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
(2) Controlling property rights means, with respect to real estate
in a good life district, the authority of a good life district applicant
or project area applicant to manage and control the development of real
estate, including through direct ownership or through leasehold rights,
joint ventures, purchase contracts, restrictive covenants, or any other
similar arrangement. Whenever such property rights do not include direct
ownership, the good life district applicant or project area applicant
shall not be considered to have controlling property rights unless such
applicant has submitted to the department a waiver and acknowledgment
from the property owner that (a) the owner consents to his or her
property being included in the project area, (b) the owner acknowledges
that the applicant or city, as applicable, will have certain rights with
respect to how local sources of revenue from the owner's property will be
spent or allocated, and (c) the owner is waiving any and all rights with
respect to all such revenues for the duration of the good life district
and that such waiver will apply to all subsequent owners of the property;
(3) Department means the Department of Economic Development;
(4) Enhanced employment area good life district retailer means (a) a
retailer located within an enhanced employment area designated for a city
of the metropolitan class under the Community Development Law and within
a good life district who has opted to be a good life district retailer
and (b) any related person. A tenant of a good life district applicant
who has a development agreement with a city of the metropolitan class for
occupation tax in an enhanced employment area within a good life district
shall be deemed to have opted to be a good life district retailer;
(5) Good life district means a district established pursuant to
section 77-4405;
(6) Good life district applicant means (a) the person who applies
for the applicable good life district pursuant to section 77-4404 and (b)
any related person;
(7) Good life district retailer means a retailer with taxable sales
-73-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
that is located in a good life district. The term includes a related
person;
(8)(a) New business means (i) a new-to-market sales tax collecting
business that was not legally licensed and located within the good life
district or within forty miles of the good life district prior to the
creation of such district and (ii) any related person.
(b) New business does not include the residential portion of any
business.
(c)(i) New business does not include the location of any entity that
for purposes of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 is either (A) not
subject to sales and use taxes or (B) not subject to either an income tax
or a franchise tax under sections 77-3801 to 77-3807 , except that a
location owned by a political subdivision shall be allowed to the extent
that the political subdivision is liable for sales taxes pursuant to
subsection (12) of section 77-4405.
(ii) For purposes of this subdivision (c):
(A) Political subdivision includes any public corporation created
for the benefit of a political subdivision and any group of political
subdivisions forming a joint public agency, organized by interlocal
agreement, or utilizing any other method of joint action; and
(B) Any partnership that would be liable for an income tax if it
were to make an election under subsection (6) of section 77-2727 is
subject to an income tax.
(d) The following transactions or activities shall not be considered
to have created a new business:
(i) The acquisition of a business that (A) does not qualify as a new
business, (B) is continued by the purchaser, and (C) was operated within
the good life district during the three hundred sixty-six days prior to
the date of acquisition;
(ii) The acquisition of a business that (A) does not qualify as a
new business, (B) is continued by the purchaser, and (C) was operated
-74-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
within this state and within forty miles of the good life district during
the three hundred sixty-six days prior to the date of acquisition;
(iii) The moving of a business from a location within this state and
within forty miles of the good life district into the good life district;
or
(iv) Any purchase or lease of property from a related person;
(9)(a) New development costs means development costs that are
incurred as part of a project located in a good life district.
(b) The value of the new development costs for any project shall be
equal to the construction and improvement costs of real property and the
acquisition costs of personal property that are part of such project,
including:
(i) Improvements to real property located in the good life district;
(ii) New construction of and additions to existing buildings;
(iii) Construction and acquisition of infrastructure improvements in
and related to the good life district; and
(iv) Acquisition of personal property located and used in the good
life district.
(c) The following transactions or activities shall not be considered
new development costs:
(i) The acquisition of a business that (A) does not qualify as a new
business, (B) is continued by the purchaser, and (C) was operated within
the good life district during the three hundred sixty-six days prior to
the date of acquisition; or
(ii) The acquisition of a business that (A) does not qualify as a
new business, (B) is continued by the purchaser, and (C) was operated
within this state and within forty miles of the good life district during
the three hundred sixty-six days prior to the date of acquisition;
(10) Project area means an area designated as a project within a
good life district pursuant to subsection (13) (14) of section 77-4405;
(11) Project area applicant means (a) the person who files an
-75-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
application for a project area designation pursuant to subsection (13)
(14) of section 77-4405 and (b) any related person;
(12) Qualified inland port district means an inland port district
created pursuant to the Municipal Inland Port Authority Act that is
located within a city of the metropolitan class;
(13) Related persons means any corporations, partnerships, limited
liability companies, or joint ventures which are or would otherwise be
members of the same unitary group, if incorporated, or any persons who
are considered to be related persons under either section 267(b) and (c)
or section 707(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(14) Relocated good life district retailer means (a) a retailer that
relocates to a good life district and that has less than one hundred
thousand square feet of retail space at the time the good life district
was established for any single location that is outside of the good life
district but located within forty miles of the good life district with no
location being equal to or greater than one hundred thousand square feet
and (b) any related person. After ten years from the date when the
relocated good life district retailer first located within the good life
district or exceeded one hundred thousand square feet of retail space,
such retailer shall no longer qualify as a relocated good life district
retailer; and
(15) Viable development means the proposed development is
demonstrated to be not inconsistent with the statutory requirements of
the good life district where the project is located.
Sec. 65. Section 77-4405, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-4405 (1) If the department finds that creation of the good life
district would not exceed the limits prescribed in subsection (4) of
section 77-4404 and the project described in the application meets the
eligibility requirements of this section, the application shall be
approved.
-76-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
(2) A project is eligible if:
(a) The good life district applicant demonstrates that the total new
development costs of the project will exceed:
(i) One billion dollars if the project will be located in a city of
the metropolitan class;
(ii) Seven hundred fifty million dollars if the project will be
located in a city of the primary class;
(iii) Five hundred million dollars if the project will be located in
a city of the first class, city of the second class, or village within a
county with a population of one hundred thousand inhabitants or more; or
(iv) One hundred million dollars if the project will be located in a
city of the first class, city of the second class, village, or sanitary
and improvement district within a county with a population of less than
one hundred thousand inhabitants;
(b) The good life district applicant demonstrates that the project
will directly or indirectly result in the creation of:
(i) One thousand new jobs if the project will be located in a city
of the metropolitan class;
(ii) Five hundred new jobs if the project will be located in a city
of the primary class;
(iii) Two hundred fifty new jobs if the project will be located in a
city of the first class, city of the second class, or village within a
county with a population of one hundred thousand inhabitants or more; or
(iv) Fifty new jobs if the project will be located in a city of the
first class, city of the second class, village, or sanitary and
improvement district within a county with a population of less than one
hundred thousand inhabitants; and
(c)(i) For a project that will be located in a county with a
population of one hundred thousand inhabitants or more, the good life
district applicant demonstrates that, upon completion of the project, at
least twenty percent of sales at the project will be made to persons
-77-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
residing outside the State of Nebraska or the project will generate a
minimum of six hundred thousand visitors per year who reside outside the
State of Nebraska and the project will attract new-to-market retail to
the state and will generate a minimum of three million visitors per year
in total. Students from another state who attend a Nebraska public or
private university shall not be counted as out-of-state residents for
purposes of this subdivision; or
(ii) For a project that will be located in a county with a
population of less than one hundred thousand inhabitants, the good life
district applicant demonstrates that, upon completion of the project, at
least twenty percent of sales at the project will be made to persons
residing outside the State of Nebraska. Students from another state who
attend a Nebraska public or private university shall not be counted as
out-of-state residents for purposes of this subdivision.
(3) The good life district applicant must certify that any
anticipated diversion of state sales tax revenue will be offset or
exceeded by sales tax paid on anticipated development costs, including
construction to real property, during the same period.
(4) Beginning on June 5, 2025, before an application may be
approved, the good life district applicant shall submit a report to the
department and to any city or village that will include the good life
district. Such report shall:
(a) Provide evidence satisfactory to the department and such city or
village that such applicant has sufficient financing for the project and
the project is financially viable;
(b) Provide evidence that such applicant has land ownership within
the proposed boundaries of the good life district or a contract giving
the applicant an option to purchase land within the proposed boundaries
of the good life district within one hundred eighty days of contract
signing; and
(c) Provide information regarding any ownership interest held by
-78-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
such applicant in any existing retail business within the proposed good
life district.
(5) A project is not eligible if:
(a) The project includes a licensed racetrack enclosure or an
authorized gaming operator as such terms are defined in section 9-1103,
except that this subdivision shall not apply to infrastructure or
facilities that are (i) publicly owned or (ii) used by or at the
direction of the Nebraska State Fair Board, so long as no gaming devices
or games of chance are expected to be operated by an authorized gaming
operator within any such facilities;
(b) The project received funds pursuant to the Shovel-Ready Capital
Recovery and Investment Act or the Economic Recovery Act, except that
this subdivision shall not apply to any project located in a qualified
inland port district; or
(c) The project includes any portion of a public or private
university.
(6) Approval of an application under this section shall establish
the good life district as that area depicted in the map accompanying the
application as submitted pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of section
77-4404 or, for any application approved on or after June 5, 2025, the
map as approved by the department. Such district shall last for thirty
years and shall not exceed two thousand acres in size if in a city of the
metropolitan class, three thousand acres in size if in any other class of
city or village, or, for any good life district created within a
qualified inland port district, the size of the qualified inland port
district. All property within a good life district shall be contiguous.
(7)(a) Prior to July 1, 2024, any transactions occurring within a
good life district shall be subject to a reduced state sales tax rate as
provided in subdivision (5) of section 77-2701.02.
(b) On and after July 1, 2024, and until October 1, 2025, any
transactions occurring within a good life district shall be subject to a
-79-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
reduced state sales tax rate as provided in subdivision (6) of section
77-2701.02.
(c) On and after October 1, 2025, any transactions, excluding sales
of aircraft, all-terrain vehicles, barges, motor vehicles, motorboats,
railroad rolling stock, semitrailers, and trailers, by a good life
district applicant or an enhanced employment area good life district
retailer that physically occur within a good life district and within the
corporate limits of a city of the metropolitan class shall be subject to
a state sales tax rate that is fifty percent of the state sales tax rate
provided in section 77-2701.02.
(d) On and after October 1, 2025, a good life district applicant or
good life district retailer shall be eligible for a state refund of fifty
percent of the state sales tax paid on new development costs for a new
business, additional good life district retailer, or relocated good life
district retailer to the extent there is excess allocation available
under subdivision (e) of this subsection at the time they are placed in
service.
(e) After the amount of sales tax collected in the portion of the
good life district located within the boundaries of a city of the
metropolitan class by a good life district applicant or good life
district retailer that is a relocated good life district retailer reaches
an aggregate total of five million dollars per year, the state shall
offset from the city's local sales tax remittance, pursuant to the Local
Option Revenue Act, any additional amount of lost state sales tax
pursuant to subdivision (c) of this subsection, and such amount shall be
credited to the General Fund, except that relocated good life district
retailers shall exceed the five-million-dollar cap to the extent there
are taxes received by the state from new businesses and additional good
life district retailers net of any allocation or refund reduction from
allocated amounts within the good life district in the amount of five
million dollars plus the excess allocation or reduction over five million
-80-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
dollars. The city may take funds collected from the enhanced employment
area occupation tax to offset the obligation. The Tax Commissioner shall
inform the city of the amount of the monthly offset.
(8) After establishment of a good life district pursuant to this
section, a good life district applicant or the city or village in which
all or a portion of the good life district is located may request that
the size of the good life district be reduced by filing an amended map
with the department and updates or supplements to the application
materials originally submitted by the good life district applicant to
demonstrate the eligibility criteria in subsection (2) of this section
will be met after the boundaries are adjusted. The department may approve
the new boundaries if the following conditions are met:
(a) The department determines that the eligibility criteria in
subsection (2) of this section will continue to be met after the proposed
boundary adjustment based on the materials submitted by the party
requesting the boundary adjustment;
(b) The adjustment is mutually agreed to by the good life district
applicant and the city or village in which all or a portion of the good
life district is located;
(c) The department shall solicit and receive from the city or
village in which all or a portion of the good life district is located
confirmation that no area being removed is attributable to local sources
of revenue which have been pledged for payment of bonds issued pursuant
to the Good Life District Economic Development Act. Confirmation may
include resolutions, meeting minutes, or other official measures adopted
or taken by the city council or village board of trustees;
(d) Either the department has received written consent from the
owners of real estate proposed to be removed from the good life district,
or a hearing is held by the department in the manner described in this
subdivision and the department finds that the removal of the affected
property is in the best interests of the state and that the removal is
-81-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
consistent with the goals and purposes of the approved application for
the good life district. In determining whether removal of the affected
property is consistent with the goals and purposes of the approved
application for the good life district, the department may consider any
formal action taken by the city council or village board of trustees.
Proof of such formal action may include resolutions, meeting minutes, or
other official measures adopted or taken. Such hearing must be held at
least ninety days after delivering written notice via certified mail to
the owners of record for the affected real estate proposed to be removed
from the good life district. The hearing must be open to the public and
for the stated purpose of hearing testimony regarding the proposed
removal of property from the good life district. Attendees must be given
the opportunity to speak and submit documentary evidence at, prior to, or
contemporaneously with such hearing for the department to consider in
making its findings; and
(e) The department shall not remove an approved project area from a
good life district.
(9) After establishment of a good life district pursuant to this
section, no property shall be added to the good life district and its
boundaries shall not be expanded.
(10) After establishment of a good life district pursuant to this
section and after any reduction is made to a good life district pursuant
to this section, the department shall transmit to any city or village
which includes such good life district within its boundaries or within
its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction (a) all information held by the
department related to the application and approval of the application,
(b) all documentation which describes the property included within the
good life district, and (c) all documentation transmitted to the
applicant for such good life district with approval of the application
and establishment of the good life district. Such city or village shall
be subject to the same confidentiality restrictions as provided in
-82-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
subsection (3) of section 77-4404, except that all such documents, plans,
and specifications included in the application which the city or village
determine define or describe the project may be provided upon written
request of any person who owns property in the applicable good life
district. The department shall also transmit a copy of the map of the
good life district, a list of all known good life district retailers and
enhanced employment area good life district retailers, and any ownership
updates to the Department of Revenue.
(11) After establishment of a good life district that exceeds one
thousand acres in size, the good life district applicant may apply to the
city or village in which all or a portion of the good life district is
located to establish development and design standards for the good life
district. Such standards may include, but are not limited to, standards
for architectural design, landscape design, construction materials, and
sustainability, but may not require property owners to utilize specific
contractors, professionals, suppliers, or service providers. The city or
village may approve the standards after holding a hearing after one
hundred eighty days' notice to all property owners in the district if the
city or village finds that the standards will ensure a comprehensive and
cohesive character and aesthetic for development in the good life
district, and that the standards will further the purposes of the Good
Life Transformational Projects Act. The development and design standards
must be commercially reasonable and consistent with terminology and
accepted practices in the architecture industry, must not conflict with
any building code or other similar law or regulation, and must not impose
an undue burden on property owners in the district. If approved, the
standards shall apply to all new construction inside of the good life
district. Any such standards shall be in addition and supplemental to any
local zoning, building code, comprehensive plan, or similar requirements
of the city or village.
(12) If the good life district applicant for an approved good life
-83-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
district is a political subdivision, such political subdivision shall not
be exempt from sales tax as provided in section 77-2704.15 on building
material purchases for a new business that will or is intended to offer
taxable sales in the good life district. For purposes of this subsection,
political subdivision includes any public corporation created for the
benefit of a political subdivision and any group of political
subdivisions forming a joint public agency, organized by interlocal
agreement, or utilizing any other method of joint action.
(12) (13) After establishment of a good life district pursuant to
this section, the good life district applicant and any other recipient of
allocated sales taxes, as defined in section 77-4410, or reduced sales
taxes shall submit an annual report to the department and to any city or
village that includes any portion of the good life district. Such report
shall be submitted by December 31 of each year that the good life
district is in existence. Such report shall include the same information
required under subsection (4) of this section.
(13)(a) (14)(a) After establishment of a good life district that is
located in a city of the first class, city of the second class, or
village within a county with a population of one hundred thousand
inhabitants or more and establishment of a good life district economic
development program in such city or village, up to six project areas may
be established in the good life district as provided in this subsection.
In a city of the metropolitan class, the good life district applicant
shall be the only project area applicant, and the good life district
applicant's project area shall be the only approved project area.
(b) Any good life district applicant who does not have controlling
property rights over the entirety of the property in the good life
district may submit an application to the department to designate a
portion of the good life district as a project area. The application
shall include (i) evidence of the applicant's controlling property rights
for the proposed project area within the good life district, (ii) a map
-84-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
of the proposed project area, (iii) a description of the development to
be pursued within the proposed project area, and (iv) a description of
how the project area is a viable development. A good life district
applicant may amend the project area application any time after it is
submitted. Any amendment must include an amended map of the proposed
project area. An application for a project area shall be subject to the
same confidentiality restrictions as provided in subsection (3) of
section 77-4404.
(c) The department may only approve an application for a project
area if, based on the evidence submitted to and considered by the
department, the department concludes that a viable development is
included in the project area application. The department shall provide
notice of its decision to the project area applicant and the city or
village that includes any portion of the applicable good life district.
(d) Approval of the project area shall establish the project area as
that area depicted in the map accompanying the application. An approved
project area shall last for the duration of the underlying good life
district unless the project area applicant requests termination of the
project area or assigns the project area to another project area
applicant.
(e) Upon approval of a project area, the project area applicant, the
department, and the city or village that includes any part of the
applicable good life district shall enter into a memorandum of
understanding as described in subsection (8) of section 77-4412. Such
memorandum of understanding shall require that the local sources of
revenue, as defined in section 77-4410, derived from within a project
area shall be used for eligible costs incurred within or related to the
project area, including payment of debt service for bonds issued pursuant
to the Good Life District Economic Development Act, and to pay other
costs of the city's or village's good life district economic development
program created under such act.
-85-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
(f) A good life district applicant may submit an application for a
project area under this subsection within ninety days after June 5, 2025.
Subject to subdivision (g) of this subsection, any other person or entity
may submit an application for a project area beginning ninety days after
June 5, 2025. Such other person or entity shall follow the same
application process as described in this subsection for a good life
district applicant. Project areas shall not overlap.
(g) The department shall not approve any other person's or entity's
project area application until one of the following occurs:
(i) The department approves the good life district applicant's
project area application and the applicant, department, and city or
village enter into a memorandum of understanding pursuant to subsection
(8) of section 77-4412; or
(ii) The good life district applicant fails to submit an application
within ninety days after June 5, 2025.
(h) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
or publish guidance regarding the process and timeline for approving
project areas. Any such rules and regulations or published guidance shall
further the state's goal of maximizing transformative development
outcomes in a timely way.
(i) An approved project area shall not be considered a separate good
life district for purposes of subsection (4) of section 77-4404.
(j) After the establishment of a project area, the project area
applicant may apply to expand its project area with approval from the
department. The department may only approve an expansion if (i) the
project area applicant has controlling property rights with respect to
property proposed to be added to the project area and submits evidence of
such controlling property rights to the department and the city or
village in which the good life district is located and (ii) all of the
property proposed to be added to the project area is within the
boundaries of the good life district.
-86-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
(k) The department may remove property from a project area if the
project area applicant no longer has controlling property rights with
respect to such property.
(l) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
governing the expansion of and removal of property from project areas.
(m) After the establishment of a project area, the project area
applicant shall submit an annual report to the department and to any city
or village that includes any portion of the good life district. Such
report shall be submitted by December 31 of each year that the good life
district is in existence. Such report shall include the same information
required under subsection (4) of this section.
(14) (15) Demonstration of meeting the required new development
costs for purposes of subdivision (2)(a) of this section may be
established by evidence submitted by the good life district applicant,
the city or village where the good life district is located, or any other
person that submits satisfactory evidence to the department.
Sec. 66. Section 77-4602, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-4602 (1) Within fifteen days after the end of each month, the Tax
Commissioner shall provide a public statement of actual General Fund net
receipts, a comparison of such actual net receipts to the monthly
estimated net receipts from the most recent forecast provided by the
Nebraska Economic Forecasting Advisory Board pursuant to section
77-27,158, and a comparison of such actual net receipts to the monthly
actual net receipts for the same month of the previous fiscal year.
(2) Within fifteen days after the end of each fiscal year, the
public statement shall also include (a) a summary of actual General Fund
net receipts and estimated General Fund net receipts for the fiscal year
as certified pursuant to sections 77-4601 and 77-4603 and (b) a
comparison of the actual General Fund net receipts for the fiscal year to
the actual General Fund net receipts for the previous fiscal year.
-87-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
(3)(a) Within fifteen days after the end of each fiscal year, the
Tax Commissioner shall determine:
(i) Actual General Fund net receipts for the most recently completed
fiscal year minus estimated General Fund net receipts for such fiscal
year as certified pursuant to sections 77-4601 and 77-4603; and
(ii) Actual General Fund net receipts for the most recently
completed fiscal year minus one hundred three percent of actual General
Fund net receipts for the prior fiscal year.
(b) If the amount calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this
section is a positive number and the amount calculated in subdivision (3)
(a)(ii) of this section is a negative number, the Tax Commissioner shall
certify the amount calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section to
the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall transfer such certified
amount to the Cash Reserve Fund.
(c) If the amounts calculated in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)
(ii) of this section are both positive numbers and the amount calculated
in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section exceeds the amount calculated in
subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this section, the Tax Commissioner shall
certify the amounts calculated in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)(ii)
of this section to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall
transfer the difference between the two certified numbers to the Cash
Reserve Fund. Through fiscal year 2026-27, the The State Treasurer shall
transfer the amount certified for subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this section
to the School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund. For fiscal year
2027-28 and every fiscal year thereafter, the State Treasurer shall
transfer the amount certified for subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this section
to the New School Relief Fund.
(d) If the amounts calculated in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)
(ii) of this section are both positive numbers and the amount calculated
in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section is less than the amount
calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this section, the Tax
-88-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
Commissioner shall certify the amount calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(i)
of this section to the State Treasurer. Through fiscal year 2026-27, the
The State Treasurer shall transfer such certified amount to the School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund. For fiscal year 2027-28 and
every fiscal year thereafter, the State Treasurer shall transfer such
certified amount to the New School Relief Fund.
Sec. 67. Section 77-7304, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-7304 (1) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund is
created. The fund shall only be used pursuant to the School District
Property Tax Relief Act. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
(2)(a) The State Treasurer shall transfer seven hundred fifty
million dollars from the General Fund to the School District Property Tax
Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2024-25, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(b) For fiscal years Beginning in fiscal year 2025-26 through
2026-27, it is the intent of the Legislature that an amount sufficient to
provide the amount of property tax relief required by subdivision (1)(a)
of section 77-7305 for each tax year be transferred from the General Fund
to the School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund.
(3) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund terminates
on July 1, 2027, and the State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the
fund on such date to the New School Relief Fund.
Sec. 68. Section 77-7305, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-7305 (1) The School District Property Tax Relief Act shall apply
to tax year 2024 through tax year 2026 and each tax year thereafter. The
-89-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
property tax relief shall be in the form of property tax credits which
appear on property tax statements. Property tax credits granted under the
act shall be credited against the amount of property taxes owed to school
districts. The total amount of property tax relief granted under the act
shall be determined as follows:
(a) For tax year 2024, the minimum amount of relief granted under
the act shall be seven hundred fifty million dollars. For tax year 2025,
the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be seven hundred
eighty million dollars. For tax year 2026, the minimum amount of relief
granted under the act shall be eight hundred eight million dollars . For
tax year 2027, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall
be eight hundred thirty-eight million dollars. For tax year 2028, the
minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be eight hundred
seventy million dollars. For tax year 2029, the minimum amount of relief
granted under the act shall be nine hundred two million dollars. For tax
year 2030 and each tax year thereafter, the minimum amount of relief
granted under the act shall be the minimum amount of relief from the
prior year, excluding any additional relief provided pursuant to
subdivision (1)(b) of this section, with such amount then increased by
three percent; and
(b) If money is transferred to the School District Property Tax
Relief Credit Fund pursuant to section 77-4602, such amount shall be
added to the minimum amount required under subdivision (1)(a) of this
section when determining the total amount of relief granted under the act
for the tax year in which the transfer occurs. If no such transfer occurs
in a given tax year, the minimum amount required under subdivision (1)(a)
of this section shall be the total amount of relief granted under the act
for such tax year.
(2) To determine the amount of the property tax credit for each
parcel, the county treasurer shall multiply the amount disbursed to the
county under subsection (4) of this section by the ratio of the school
-90-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
district taxes levied in the current year on the parcel to the school
district taxes levied in the current year on all real property in the
county. The amount so determined shall be the property tax credit for
that parcel.
(3) If the real property owner qualifies for a homestead exemption
under sections 77-3501 to 77-3529, the owner shall also be qualified for
the property tax credit provided in this section to the extent of any
remaining liability after calculation of the homestead exemption. If the
property tax credit provided in this section results in a property tax
liability on the homestead that is less than zero, the amount of the
credit which cannot be used by the taxpayer shall be returned to the
Property Tax Administrator by July 1 of the year the amount disbursed to
the county was disbursed. For fiscal years 2024-25 through 2026-27, the
The Property Tax Administrator shall immediately credit any funds
returned under this subsection to the School District Property Tax Relief
Credit Fund. Beginning July 1, 2027, the Property Tax Administrator shall
credit such funds to the New School Relief Fund. Upon the return of any
funds under this subsection, the county treasurer shall electronically
file a report with the Property Tax Administrator, on a form prescribed
by the Tax Commissioner, indicating the amount of funds distributed to
each school district in the county in the year the funds were returned
and the amount of unused credits returned.
(4) The amount disbursed to each county under this section shall be
equal to the amount available for disbursement under subsection (1) of
this section multiplied by the ratio of the school district taxes levied
in the prior year on all real property in the county to the school
district taxes levied in the prior year on all real property in the
state. By September 15, 2024, and by September 15, 2026 of each year
thereafter, the Property Tax Administrator shall determine the amount to
be disbursed under this subsection to each county and shall certify such
amounts to the State Treasurer and to each county. The disbursements to
-91-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
the counties shall occur in two equal payments, the first on or before
January 31 and the second on or before April 1.
(5) After retaining one percent of the amount received under
subsection (4) of this section for costs, the county treasurer shall
disburse the remaining funds, which are credited against the amount of
property taxes owed to school districts, in the same manner as if such
funds had been received in the form of property tax payments for property
taxes owed to school districts, meaning any amounts attributable to
divided taxes pursuant to section 18-2147 of the Community Development
Law shall be remitted to the applicable authority for which such taxes
were divided.
(6) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund shall be
used for purposes of making the disbursements to counties required under
subsection (4) of this section.
Sec. 69. Section 79-1006, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1006 (1) For school fiscal year 2023-24 and each school fiscal
year thereafter, the department shall determine the foundation aid to be
paid to each school district in accordance with subsection (2) of this
section.
(2)(a) For school fiscal years prior to school fiscal year 2027-28,
the (2) The foundation aid to be paid to each school district in each
school fiscal year shall equal one thousand five hundred dollars
multiplied by the number of formula students for such school district.
(b) For school fiscal year 2027-28 and each school fiscal year
thereafter, the foundation aid to be paid to each school district in each
school fiscal year shall equal the number of formula students for such
school district multiplied by the sum of:
(i) One thousand five hundred dollars; and
(ii) The amount determined pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section.
-92-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
(3) For school fiscal year 2027-28 and each school fiscal year
thereafter, the department shall determine an amount of additional
foundation aid to be paid per formula student out of funds available in
the New School Relief Fund. Such amount shall be equal to the total
amount available in the New School Relief Fund divided by the total
number of formula students in all school districts in the state.
(4) (3) Twenty-four percent of the total amount of foundation aid
paid each school fiscal year, excluding any foundation aid paid from the
New School Relief Fund, shall be paid from money appropriated from the
Education Future Fund.
(5) (4) For school fiscal years 2023-24 and 2024-25, one hundred
percent of foundation aid shall be included as a formula resource
pursuant to section 79-1017.01. For school fiscal year 2025-26 and each
school fiscal year thereafter, sixty percent of foundation aid shall be
included as a formula resource pursuant to section 79-1017.01.
Sec. 70. Section 79-3405, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3405 (1) A school district's property tax request may exceed its
property tax request authority by an amount approved by a sixty percent
majority of legal voters voting on the issue at a special election called
for such purpose upon the recommendation of the school board of such
school district or upon the receipt by the county clerk or election
commissioner of a petition requesting an election signed by at least five
percent of the legal voters of the school district. The recommendation of
the school board or the petition of the legal voters shall include the
amount by which the school board would increase its property tax request
for the year over and above the property tax request authority of such
school district. The county clerk or election commissioner shall call for
a special election on the issue within thirty days after the receipt of
such school board recommendation or legal voter petition. The election
shall be held pursuant to the Election Act, and all costs shall be paid
-93-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
by the school district.
(2)(a) A school district may increase the base growth percentage
used to determine its property tax request authority under section
79-3403 by a percentage approved by an affirmative vote of at least
seventy percent of the school board of such school district. The maximum
base growth percentage that may be approved under this subsection shall
be:
(i) The base growth percentage that would otherwise be applicable
plus an additional seven percent for school districts with an average
daily membership of no more than four hundred seventy-one students;
(ii) The base growth percentage that would otherwise be applicable
plus an additional six percent for school districts with an average daily
membership of more than four hundred seventy-one students but no more
than three thousand forty-four students;
(iii) The base growth percentage that would otherwise be applicable
plus an additional five percent for school districts with an average
daily membership of more than three thousand forty-four students but no
more than ten thousand students; or
(iv) The base growth percentage that would otherwise be applicable
plus an additional four percent for school districts with an average
daily membership of more than ten thousand students.
(b) Before a school board votes to increase a school district's base
growth percentage under this subsection, the school board shall publish
notice of the upcoming vote in a legal newspaper of general circulation
in the school district. Such publication shall occur at least one week
prior to the public meeting at which the vote will be taken.
(3) A school district's property tax request may exceed its property
tax request authority pursuant to any property tax authority approved by
the voters at a levy override election under section 77-3444 held prior
to January 1, 2024.
(4) A school district may exceed its property tax request authority
-94-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
without the approval of the voters by an amount equal to six percent of
the school district's prior year property tax request authority. Such
increase shall be used to pay for teacher salaries, wages, and benefits.
For purposes of this subsection, teacher means any certified employee who
is regularly employed for the instruction of pupils in the public
schools.
Sec. 71. (1) The New School Relief Fund is hereby created. The fund
shall be administered by the State Department of Education and shall
consist of money transferred pursuant to subdivision (2)(f) of section
77-27,132 and the amount transferred pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The fund shall
be used to provide additional foundation aid to school districts pursuant
to subsection (3) of section 79-1006.
(2) Beginning in fiscal year 2027-28, the State Treasurer shall
transfer eight hundred thirty-eight million dollars from the General Fund
to the New School Relief Fund on or before September 1, 2027, and on or
before September 1 of each year thereafter.
(3) Beginning in fiscal year 2027-28, if the state fails to use all
funds available in the New School Relief Fund for the additional
foundation aid described in subsection (3) of section 79-1006 for any
fiscal year, each school district may, if approved by a majority vote of
the school board for the school district, levy an amount for such fiscal
year sufficient to generate revenue equal to the amount of foundation aid
that should have been provided to such school district, not to exceed
three cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property
subject to the levy. The property tax levy provided for in this
subsection is in addition to the maximum allowable property tax levy
described in subdivision (2)(a) of section 77-3442.
Sec. 72. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
-95-

LB1257 LB1257
2026 2026
Sec. 73. Original sections 2-2701, 77-2701.24, 77-2701.36,
77-2704.03, 77-2704.04, 77-2704.05, 77-2704.07, 77-2704.10, 77-2704.13,
77-2704.14, 77-2704.16, 77-2704.17, 77-2704.22, 77-2704.23, 77-2704.24,
77-2704.25, 77-2704.26, 77-2704.27, 77-2704.28, 77-2704.30, 77-2704.38,
77-2704.39, 77-2704.40, 77-2704.41, 77-2704.42, 77-2704.45, 77-2704.46,
77-2704.47, 77-2704.48, 77-2704.50, 77-2704.51, 77-2704.52, 77-2704.53,
77-2704.56, 77-2704.57, 77-2704.58, 77-2704.60, 77-2704.61, 77-2704.62,
77-2704.63, 77-2704.64, 77-2704.65, 77-2704.67, 77-2706, 77-27,235,
79-1006, and 79-3405, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, sections
77-382, 77-2701, 77-2701.04, 77-2701.32, 77-2703.01, 77-2704.12,
77-2704.15, 77-2704.20, 77-2704.36, 77-2704.68, 77-2704.69, and
77-27,132, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections
77-2701.16, 77-2703, 77-2706.02, 77-3442, 77-4403, 77-4405, 77-4602,
77-7304, and 77-7305, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 74. The following section is outright repealed: Section
77-2701.56, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024.
-96-